




http://www.empirestatelymediseaseassociation.org/BOOKS/1FREE-books/GUNS-GERMS-AND-STEEL.pdf

https://www.bxscience.edu/ourpages/auto/2014/5/2/72947755/cajamarca.htm
	The most dramatic moment in subsequent European-Native American relations was the first encounter between the Inca emperor Atahuallpa and the Spanish conquistador Francisco Pizarro at the Peruvian highland town of Cajamarca on November 16, 1532. Atahuallpa was absolute monarch of the largest and most advanced state in the New World, while Pizarro represented the Holy Roman Emperor Charles V (also known as King Charles I of Spain), monarch of the most powerful state in Europe. Pizarro, leading a ragtag group of 168 Spanish soldiers, was in unfamiliar terrain, ignorant of the local inhabitants, completely out of touch with the nearest Spaniards (1,000 miles to the north in Panama) and far beyond the reach of timely reinforcements. Atahuallpa was in the middle of his own empire of millions of subjects and immediately surrounded by his army of 80,000 soldiers, recently victorious in a war with other Indians. Nevertheless, Pizarro captured Atahuallpa within a few minutes after the two leaders first set eyes on each other. Pizarro proceeded to hold his prisoner for eight months, while extracting history's largest ransom in return for a promise to free him. After the ransom-enough gold to fill a room 22 feet long by 17 feet wide to a height of over 8 feet-was delivered, Pizarro reneged n his promise and executed Atahuallpa.

	Atahuallpa's capture was decisive for the European conquest of the Inca Empire. Although the Spaniards' superior weapons would have assured an ultimate Spanish victory in any case, the capture made the conquest quicker and infinitely easier. Atahuallpa was revered by the Incas as a sun- god and exercised absolute authority over his subjects, who obeyed even the orders he issued from captivity. The months until his death gave Pizarro time to dispatch exploring parties unmolested to other parts of the Inca Empire, and to send for reinforcements from Panama. When fighting between Spaniards and Incas finally did commence after Atahuallpa's execution, the Spanish forces were more formidable.

	...What unfolded that day at Cajamarca is well known, because it was recorded in writing by many of the Spanish participants. To get a flavor of those events, let us relive them by weaving together excerpts from eyewitness accounts by six of Pizarro's companions, including his brothers Hernando and Pedro:

	"The prudence, fortitude, military discipline, labors, perilous navigations, and battles of the Spaniards-vassals of the most invincible Emperor of the Roman Catholic Empire, our natural King and Lord-will cause joy to the faithful and terror to the infidels. For this reason, and for the glory of God our Lord and for the service of the Catholic Imperial Majesty, it has seemed good to me to write this narrative, and to send it to Your Majesty, that all may have knowledge of what is here related. It will be to the glory of God, because they have conquered and brought to our holy Catholic Faith so vast a number of heathens, aided by His holy guidance. It will be to the honor of our Emperor because, by reason of his great power and good fortune, such events happened in his time. It will give joy to the faithful that such battles have been won, such provinces discovered and conquered, such riches brought home for the King and for themselves; and that such terror has been spread among the infidels, such admiration excited in all mankind.

	"For when, either in ancient or modern times, have such great exploits been achieved by so-few against so many, over so many climes, across so many seas, over such distances by land, to subdue the unseen and unknown? Whose deeds can be compared with those of Spain? Our Spaniards, being few in number, never having more than 200 or 300 men together, and sometimes only 100 and even fewer, have, in our times, conquered more territory than has ever been known before, or than all the faithful and infidel princes possess. I will only write, at present, of what befell in the conquest, and I will not write much, in order to avoid prolixity.

	"Governor Pizarro wished to obtain intelligence from some Indians who had come from Cajamarca, so he had them tortured. They confessed that they had heard that Atahuallpa was waiting for the Governor at Cajamarca. The Governor then ordered us to advance. On reaching, the entrance to Cajamarca, we saw the camp of Atahuallpa at a distance of a league, in the skirts of the mountains. The Indians' camp looked like a very beautiful city. They had so many tents that we were all filled with great apprehension. Until then, we had never seen anything like this in the Indies. It filled all our Spaniards with fear and confusion. But we could not show any fear or turn back, for if the Indians had sensed any weakness in us, even the Indians that we were bringing with us as guides would have killed us. So we made a show of good spirits, and after carefully observing the town and the tents, we descended into the valley and entered Cajamarca.


above from Miguel de Estete in Letter to Emperor Charles V, 1533: https://books.google.com/books?id=_FLBGtghVE0C&pg=PT149&lpg=PT149

wiki says he wrote "A report of the trip that Captain Hernando Pizarro made by order of the Lord Governor, his brother, from the village of Caxamalca to Pachacama and from there to Jauja" and "The Discovery and the Conquest of Peru" (not published until 20th century): https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=es&u=https://es.wikipedia.org/wiki/Miguel_de_Estete

according to Estete, Pizarro learned Atahuallpa was waiting for him at Cajamarca from torturing some Incas who came from there. Says Pizzaro's men saw how many tents the Incans had there and were afraid, but could not show weakness or the Incans would kill them.


	"We talked a lot among ourselves about what to do. All of us were full of fear, because we were so few in number and we had penetrated so far into a land where we could not hope to receive reinforcements. We all met with the Governor to debate what we should undertake the next day. Few of us slept that night, and we kept watch in the square of Cajamarca, looking at the campfires of the Indian army. It was a frightening sight. Most of the campfires were on a hillside and so close to each other that it looked like the sky brightly studded with stars. There was no distinction that night between the mighty and the lowly, or between foot soldiers and horsemen. Everyone carried out sentry duty fully armed. So too did the good old Governor, who went about encouraging his men. The Governor's brother Hernando Pizarro estimated the number of Indian soldiers there at 40,000, but he was telling a lie just to encourage us, for there were actually more than 80,000 Indians.


above from Cristóbal de Mena: http://www.historyisaweapon.com/defcon7/%5BHemming_John%5D_The_Conquest_of_the_Incas(BookZZ.org).pdf (pg 34)

wiki says he wrote "The Conquest of Peru called the New Castile" in 1534 without signing it, which was the first account of the conquest: https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=es&u=https://es.wikipedia.org/wiki/Crist%25C3%25B3bal_de_Mena

book was written anonymously and is sometimes also attributed to Xeres

according to de Mena (or Xeres), Pizarro's men were scared since they were greatly outnumbered and far from reinforcements. de Mena says they spent the night encamped next to the Incas camps, and few of them slept and kept watch fully armed. Says Hernando said there were 40,000 Incan soldiers, but that was a lie to encourage them since there were actually 80,000. 


	"On the next morning a messenger from Atahuallpa arrived, and the Governor said to him 'Tell your lord to come when and how he pleases, and that, in what way soever he may come I will receive him as a friend and brother. I pray that he may come quickly, for I desire to see him. No harm or insult will befall him.'


appears to be from Francisco de Xeres, the secretary of Pizarro: http://media.bloomsbury.com/rep/files/primary-source-57-narrative-of-the-conquest-of-peru.pdf (pg 4-5)

also appears in this: https://books.google.com/books?id=Q34Xx5e8E0QC&pg=PA50&lpg=PA50

this is same: https://archive.org/details/uerdaderarelacio00xere

wiki says he wrote Verdadera Relación de la conquista del Perú" in June 1534: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Francisco_Xerez

same book also sometimes attributed to de Mena

This is the first account of the conquest published, published anonymously and said to have been best seller


according to de Xeres (different from above quote), Atabaliba told Pizarro's men he heard they attacked some Incans earlier, but then started making some kind of deal where Pizarro would help Atabaliba attack a rebellious Incan Cacique. Says Atibaliba and Pizarros captains shared a drink, and expected Atibaliba to see Pizarro the next morning. Atibaliba set up camp with armed men on guard, and when Pizarro heard this he had his men stay on watch that night armed. de Xeres says a messenger from Atabaliba came saying the emperor wants to come with armed guards, and Pizzaro replied come any way you like and I will recieve you "as a friend and brother." Then another messenger came saying Atabaliba will come unarmed, and Pizarro replied "So let it be, and I pray that he may come quickly, for I desire to see him."


	"The Governor concealed his troops around the square at Cajamarca, dividing the cavalry into two portions of which he gave the command of one to his brother Hernando Pizarro and the command of the other to Hernando de Soto. In like manner he divided the infantry, he himself taking one part and giving the other to his brother Juan Pizarro. At the same time, he ordered Pedro de Candia with two or three infantrymen to go with trumpets to a small fort in the plaza and to station themselves there with a small piece of artillery. When all the Indians, and Atahuallpa with them, had entered the Plaza, the Governor would give a signal to Candia and his men, after which they should start firing the gun, and the trumpets should sound, and at the sound of the trumpets the cavalry should dash out of the large court where they were waiting hidden in readiness.


above from Pedro Pizarro: https://archive.org/stream/relationofdiscov00pizauoft/relationofdiscov00pizauoft_djvu.txt

according to Pedro, Pizarro arranged his troops around the square at Cajamarca. The plan was that when Atahuallpa and his entourage entered, Pizarro would give a signal and they would start firing the gun, sound trumpets, and cavalry would charge in.


	"At noon Atahuallpa began to draw up his men and to approach. Soon we saw the entire plain full of Indians halting periodically to wait for more Indians who kept filing out of the camp behind them. They kept filling out in separate detachments into the afternoon. The front detachments were now close to our camp, and still more troops kept issuing from the camp of the Indians. In front of Atahuallpa went 2,000 Indians who swept the road ahead of him, and these were followed by the warriors, half of whom were marching in the fields on one side of him and half on the other side.


according to Pedro, Atahuallpa arrived in procession of Incan troops with 2,000 (civilians?) sweeping the road in front of him followed by warriors marching in the field on each side of Atahaullpa 




------


http://www.historyisaweapon.com/defcon7/%5BHemming_John%5D_The_Conquest_of_the_Incas(BookZZ.org).pdf
	Fortunately for us, the
	contingents sent to visit Atahualpa on that first evening included some of the chroniclers
	who left eyewitness accounts: Hernando Pizarro, Miguel de Estete, Juan Ruiz de Arce,
	Diego de Trujillo and possibly Cristobal de Mena and Pedro Pizarro.


https://www.bxscience.edu/ourpages/auto/2014/5/2/72947755/cajamarca.htm
	"First came a squadron of Indians dressed in clothes of different colors, like a chessboard. They advanced, removing the straws from the ground and sweeping the road. Next came three squadrons in different dresses, dancing and singing. Then came a number of men with armor, large metal plates, and crowns of gold and silver. So great was the amount of furniture of gold and silver which they bore, that it was a marvel to observe how the sun glinted upon it. Among them came the figure of Atahuallpa in a very fine litter with the ends of its timbers covered in silver. Eighty lords carried him on their shoulders, all wearing a very rich blue livery. Atahuallpa himself was very richly dressed, with his crown on his head and a collar of large emeralds around his neck. He sat on a small stool with a rich saddle cushion resting on his litter. The litter was lined with parrot feathers of many colors and decorated with plates of gold and silver.


this says the quote is from a letter to the King of Spain: https://books.google.com/books?id=QPhJDwAAQBAJ&pg=PT87&lpg=PT87 . Expands quote and cites back to "Guns Germs and Steel", which doesn't source quote


some parts of this translation are word-for-word the same as the 1534 Seville book:

https://books.google.com/books?id=Q34Xx5e8E0QC&pg=PA53&lpg=PA53
	First came a squadron of Indians dressed in a livery of different colours, like a chess board. They advanced, removing the straws from the ground, and sweeping the road.


says very similar thing to that paragraph afterward, but missing sentence "So great was the amount of furniture of gold and silver which they bore, that it was a marvel to observe how the sun glinted upon it." 


the original spanish of his book is:

http://www.historiadelnuevomundo.com/index.php/2018/02/verdadera-relacion-conquista-del-peru/ pg 88

or here:

https://books.google.com/books?id=JbkkP0fR2nkC&pg=RA2-PT341&lpg=RA2-PT341
	Luego la delantera de la gente comenzó a entrar en la plaza; venía delante un escuadrón de indios vestidos de una librea de colores a manera de escaques; éstos venían quitando las pajas del suelo y barriendo el camino.


Pizarro's men re-use text in their accounts? or a translation problem?

google translates this to:


	Then the front of the people began to enter the square; A squadron of Indians dressed in a livery of colors, in the manner of escaques, came before them; these came removing the straws from the ground and sweeping the road.



looks like same passage:

http://www.abc.es/historia/abci-batalla-minusculo-ejercito-francisco-pizarro-capturo-prepotente-emperador-inca-201611160255_noticia.html
	"They carried such an amount of gold and silver table service that it was wonderful to see it shine in the sun." 

	As Pedro Pizarro (cousin of Francisco) explains in his chronicles, Atahualpa was up in a rich litter (which had pillows of parrot feather) and surrounded by hundreds of fighters who formed in phalanges: "Two thousand Indians were ahead of him , sweeping the road [paved] by which he traveled. [...] They carried such a quantity of tableware of gold and silver that it was wonderful to see it shine under the sun [...] Ahead of Atahualpa many Indians were singing and dancing ».

	..." Eighty gentlemen carried [the Inca lord] on their shoulders , and all wore very rich blue uniforms. Atabilpa himself was dressed very richly, with his crown on his head and a necklace of large emeralds around his neck. I was sitting on a small seat that had a sumptuous cushion, "said Miguel de Estete 


quote supposedly from Estete: Ochenta señores llevaban sobre sus hombros, y todos llevaban uniformes muy ricos de color azul. El propio Atabilpa iba vestido muy ricamente, con su corona en la cabeza y un collar de grandes esmeraldas alrededor del cuello.

quoted here and also attributed to Estete: https://books.google.com/books?id=msJcDAAAQBAJ&pg=PT99&lpg=PT99


google search doesn't find quote anywhere except that book and ABC article: https://www.google.es/search?&q=Atabilpa+iba+vestido+muy+ricamente+con+su+corona+en+la+cabeza+y+un+collar+de+grandes+esmeraldas+alrededor+del+cuello&oq=Atabilpa+iba+vestido+muy+ricamente+con+su+corona+en+la+cabeza+y+un+collar+de+grandes+esmeraldas+alrededor+del+cuello


https://archive.org/stream/reportsondiscov00sancgoog/reportsondiscov00sancgoog_djvu.txt
	< First came three hundred youths with bows and arrows, singing, 
	and cleaning the road with their hands. Then came a thousand men 
	with pikes, having no iron tips, but with the points hardened in the fire. 
	They wore a livery of white and red squares, like a chess board. A 
	third squadron then entered, with hammers of copper and silver. (Rela- 
	cioii del Primer Descuhrimiento MS.) 

	' He wore a collar of large emeralds. (Relacion, etc.) 

	^ It was borne by eighty chiefs, all dressed in a very rich blue livery. 
	{Relacion, etc.) 


https://books.google.com/books?id=m6qEC9ZGzR0C&pg=PA251&dq=%22Relaci%C3%B3n+Del+Primer+Descubrimiento%22&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiJzYDttuPaAhVBmuAKHcNfA7AQ6AEIODAD#v=onepage&q=%22Relaci%C3%B3n%20Del%20Primer%20Descubrimiento%22&f=false


this is from "Relacion del Primer Descuchrimiento de la Costa y Mar del sur:"

https://books.google.com/books?id=6BsTAAAAYAAJ&pg=PA349&lpg=PA349

http://www.cervantesvirtual.com/obra-visor/cronistas-coloniales-primera-parte--0/html/0000fb16-82b2-11df-acc7-002185ce6064_8.html#I_60_
	At four o'clock they began to walk along its causeway, going straight ahead to where we were, and at five o'clock or so, arrived at the city gate, leaving all the fields covered with people, and thus began to enter the plaza until three hundred men like young men with their bows and arrows in their hands singing a song not funny at all for those of us who heard it, formerly frightening because it seemed hellish thing, and they walked around that mosque, holding the floor with their hands to clean what he was, of which there was little need because the people of the town had him well swept by the time he entered. Finished turning around all together, and entered another squad of up to a thousand men with pikes without mistakes, toast the tips, all of a livery of colors, I say that the former was white and red, like the houses of an ax . Entering the second squad entered the third of another livery, all with hammers in the hands of copper and silver, which is a weapon they have; and in this way many important gentlemen came into the said square, who came in between the forwards and the person of Atabalipa. Behind them, in a very rich litter, the ends of the logs covered with silver, came the person of Atabalipa, which brought about eighty gentlemen on his shoulders, all dressed in a very rich blue livery, and he dressed his person very richly with his crown on the head, and around the neck a necklace of large emeralds, and sitting on the bunk in a very small chair with a very rich coxin. On reaching the middle of the square stopped, having discovered the half body from outside; and all the war that was in the place they had him in the middle, being inside until six or seven thousand men. As he saw that no person went out to him or seemed, he had believed, and so he confessed after the prisoner, that we had hidden ourselves from fear of seeing his power; and he gave a voice and said, "Where are these?" To which the friar Vicente de Valverde, of the order of the preachers, who later became Bishop of that country, with the bribia in his hand and with him a tongue, came out of the apartment of the said governor Pizarro, and together they arrived among the people to be able to speak with Atabalipa, to which he began to say things of the sacred scripture, and that Our Lord Jesu-Christo commanded that among his people there be no war or discord, but all peace, and that he in his name asked and required; for he had been left to deal with it the day before, and to come alone without people of war. To which words and many others that the frayle told him, he was silent without replying; and making him say that he should look at what God had commanded, which was in that book he was holding in his hand, admiring in my opinion more of the scripture than of what was written in it, he asked for the book, and he opened it and looked through it; looking at the mold and the order of it; and after seeing it, he threw him among the people with a lot of anger, his face very fierce, saying: "Tell those who come here, that I will not leave here until they realize and satisfy me and pay what they have done in the earth". Seen this by the frayle and the little that took advantage of his words, he took his book, and lowered his head, and went to where was the said Pizarro, almost running and said "Do not you see what happens? What are you in terms of comediments and requirements with this dog full of pride, that the fields full of Indians come? Go out to him! I absolve you. " And I have just finished saying these words, which were all in an instant, they blow the trumpets, and part of their inn with all the people on foot who were with him, saying: "Santiago to them!", And so we all left to that voice to one, because all those houses that went out to the square had many doors, and it seems that they had done that purpose. In attacking those on horseback and breaking through them, all was one, that without killing but only a black man on our side, they were all defeated and Atabalipa was imprisoned, and the people were fleeing, although they could not escape from the throng, because the They had entered it was small and with the embarrassment they could not leave; and when they saw the backs how far away they had the acoxida and the remedy of fleeing, they drew up two or three thousand of them to a canvas wall, and they went ashore with it, which went out into the field, because there were no houses on that side, and they had wide way to flee; and the squadrons of people who had remained in the field without entering the town, as they saw fleeing and howling, most of them were broken up and they fled, which was a thing to see that a valley of four or five leagues all It was full of people. In this the night came very quickly, and the people gathered and Atabalipa put himself in a stone house that was the temple of the Sun, and so he spent that night with great joy and pleasure of the victory that Our Lord had given us, I put a lot of attention on guarding the person of Atabalipa, so you do not come back


on "Relacion:"

https://books.google.com/books?id=m6qEC9ZGzR0C&pg=PA39&lpg=PA39
	Cieza de Leon, Cronica, cap. ix.--Relacion del Primer Descubrimiento de la Costa y Mar del Sur, MS.

	This anonymous document of one of the early conquerors contains a minute and probably trustworthy account of both the high-roads, which the writer saw in their glory, and which he ranks among the greatest wonders of the world.	


https://books.google.com/books?id=w00sAAAAIAAJ&pg=PA32&lpg=PA32
	Anon, MS., Relacion



from "Relacion:"

http://www.cervantesvirtual.com/obra-visor/cronistas-coloniales-primera-parte--0/html/0000fb16-82b2-11df-acc7-002185ce6064_8.html#I_60_
	Detrás déstos, en una litera muy rica, los cabos de los maderos cubiertos de plata, venía la persona de Atabalipa, la cual traían ochenta señores en hombros, todos vestidos de una librea azul muy rica, y él vestida su persona muy ricamente con su corona en la cabeza, y al cuello un collar de esmeraldas grandes, y sentado en la litera en una silla muy pequeña con un coxín muy rico.


from quote attributed to Eteste:

http://www.abc.es/historia/abci-batalla-minusculo-ejercito-francisco-pizarro-capturo-prepotente-emperador-inca-201611160255_noticia.html
	Ochenta señores llevaban sobre sus hombros, y todos llevaban uniformes muy ricos de color azul. El propio Atabilpa iba vestido muy ricamente, con su corona en la cabeza y un collar de grandes esmeraldas alrededor del cuello.




from translation of 1534 Seville book:

https://books.google.com/books?id=Q34Xx5e8E0QC&pg=PA53&lpg=PA53
	First came a squadron of Indians dressed in a livery of different colours, like a chess board. They advanced, removing the straws from the ground, and sweeping the road. Next came three squadrons, dancing and singing. Then came a number of men with armour, large metal plats, and crowns of gold and silver. Among them was Atabaliba in a litter lined with plumes of macaw's feathers, of many colours, and adorned with plates of gold and silver. Many Indians carried it on their shoulders on high. Next came two other litters and two hammocks, in which were some principal cheifs; and lastly, several squadrons of Indians with crowns of gold and silver.


from quote apparently by Estete:

http://www.empirestatelymediseaseassociation.org/BOOKS/1FREE-books/GUNS-GERMS-AND-STEEL.pdf
	"First came a squadron of Indians dressed in clothes of different colors, like a chessboard. They advanced, removing the straws from the ground and sweeping the road. Next came three squadrons in different dresses, dancing and singing. Then came a number of men with armor, large metal plates, and crowns of gold and silver. So great was the amount of furniture of gold and silver which they bore, that it was a marvel to observe how the sun glinted upon it. Among them came the figure of Atahuallpa in a very fine litter with the ends of its timbers covered in silver. Eighty lords carried him on their shoulders, all wearing a very rich blue livery. Atahuallpa himself was very richly dressed, with his crown on his head and a collar of large emeralds around his neck. He sat on a small stool with a rich saddle cushion resting on his litter. The litter was lined with parrot feathers of many colors and decorated with plates of gold and silver.



from Pedro Pizarro:

https://archive.org/stream/relationofdiscov00pizauoft/relationofdiscov00pizauoft_djvu.txt
	he [Atabalipa] began to draw up his men and to approach nearer to Caxamalca. When his squadrons were formed in such wise that they covered the fields, and when he himself had mounted into a litter, he began to march; before him went two thousand Indians who swept the road by which he travelled, and these were followed by the warriours, half of whom were marching in the fields on one side of him and half on the other side, and neither half entered upon the road itself at all. In like manner, he bore with him the Lord of Chincha, riding upon a litter, which seemed to his men a wonderful honour, for no Indian, no matter how great a Lord he might be, ever appeared before him [the Inga] save with a burden upon his back and with naked feet. Then, too, so great was the amount of furniture of gold and silver which they bore, that it was a marvel to observe how the sun glinted upon it. Likewise, there marched before Atabalipa many Indians singing and dancing. 


from "Relación del primer descubrimiento de la Costa y Mar del Sur":

http://www.cervantesvirtual.com/obra-visor/cronistas-coloniales-primera-parte--0/html/0000fb16-82b2-11df-acc7-002185ce6064_8.html#I_60_
	At four o'clock they began to walk along its causeway, going straight ahead to where we were, and at five o'clock or so, arrived at the city gate, leaving all the fields covered with people, and thus began to enter the plaza until three hundred men like young men with their bows and arrows in their hands singing a song not funny at all for those of us who heard it, formerly frightening because it seemed hellish thing, and they walked around that mosque, holding the floor with their hands to clean what he was, of which there was little need because the people of the town had him well swept by the time he entered. Finished turning around all together, and entered another squad of up to a thousand men with pikes without mistakes, toast the tips, all of a livery of colors, I say that the former was white and red, like the houses of an ax . Entering the second squad entered the third of another livery, all with hammers in the hands of copper and silver, which is a weapon they have; and in this way many important gentlemen came into the said square, who came in between the forwards and the person of Atabalipa. Behind them, in a very rich litter, the ends of the logs covered with silver, came the person of Atabalipa, which brought about eighty gentlemen on his shoulders, all dressed in a very rich blue livery, and he dressed his person very richly with his crown on the head, and around the neck a necklace of large emeralds, and sitting on the bunk in a very small chair with a very rich coxin.



plagiarizing their memoirs?

make same observations, some share same sentences:


https://archive.org/stream/relationofdiscov00pizauoft/relationofdiscov00pizauoft_djvu.txt
	...Then, too, so great was the amount of furniture of gold and silver which they bore, that it was a marvel to observe how the sun glinted upon it.

http://www.empirestatelymediseaseassociation.org/BOOKS/1FREE-books/GUNS-GERMS-AND-STEEL.pdf
	...So great was the amount of furniture of gold and silver which they bore, that it was a marvel to observe how the sun glinted upon it.



http://www.cervantesvirtual.com/obra-visor/cronistas-coloniales-primera-parte--0/html/0000fb16-82b2-11df-acc7-002185ce6064_8.html#I_60_
	...came the person of Atabalipa, which brought about eighty gentlemen on his shoulders, all dressed in a very rich blue livery, and he dressed his person very richly with his crown on the head, and around the neck a necklace of large emeralds


http://www.empirestatelymediseaseassociation.org/BOOKS/1FREE-books/GUNS-GERMS-AND-STEEL.pdf
	...came the figure of Atahuallpa in a very fine litter with the ends of its timbers covered in silver. Eighty lords carried him on their shoulders, all wearing a very rich blue livery. Atahuallpa himself was very richly dressed, with his crown on his head and a collar of large emeralds around his neck.




multiple anonymous works of accounts of Pizarro's men were written, with attempts made to attribute them:


http://www.historyisaweapon.com/defcon7/%5BHemming_John%5D_The_Conquest_of_the_Incas(BookZZ.org).pdf
	his quotation (Sinclair 27) is from La Conquista del Perú published in Seville in April 1534. It was the first published account of the fantastic discoveries and was, for its day, a best-seller, being rapidly translated into other languages. It was regarded as anonymous by Prescott and by two American editors, Sinclair and Pogo, who published texts in 1929 and 1930. In 1935, Raúl Porras Barrenechea showed that the account was almost certainly by Captain Cristóbal de Mena. The Governors of Panama wrote that Mena had arrived there in August 1533 with a narrative account 'that he is going to give to his Majesty', and Mena reached Seville in the first ship containing Peruvian conquerors in November 1533, just in time to prepare his work for publication the following spring. I accept the attribution of this anonymous chronicle to Mena.


http://www.worldcat.org/title/conquista-del-peru/oclc/11550994
	La conquista del Perú
	Author: 	Francisco de Xerez

	Originally published as: Verdadera relación de la Conquista del Perú y Provincia del Cuzco llamada la Nueva Castilla.
	Reprint. Originally published: 1534.


https://books.google.com/books?id=m6qEC9ZGzR0C&pg=PA39&lpg=PA39
	Relacion del Primer Descubrimiento de la Costa y Mar del Sur, MS.

	This anonymous document of one of the early conquerors


https://translate.google.com/translate?sl=es&tl=en&js=y&prev=_t&hl=en&ie=UTF-8&u=https%3A%2F%2Fes.wikipedia.org%2Fwiki%2FMiguel_de_Estete&edit-text=&act=url
	Miguel de Estete , ( Santo Domingo de la Calzada , Spain , 1495 ? - Huamanga , Peru , around 1572 ) was a Spanish conquistador and chronicler . Author of a famous chronicle or relation of the conquest of Peru , entitled The discovery and conquest of Peru , which ranges from the arrival of the Spaniards to the territory of the Inca Empire until the capture of Cuzco , a relationship that remained unpublished until the twentieth century . 

	...He then participated in the march to Cuzco, where he was impressed by the majesty of its buildings. In 1534 or 1535 he wrote A report of the trip that Captain Hernando Pizarro made by order of the Lord Governor, his brother, from the village of Caxamalca to Pachacama and from there to Jauja , which was completely transcribed in the works of Francisco de Jerez and Gonzalo Fernández de Oviedo . At that time, another relationship of the conquest that would have been published in the 20th century , titled The Discovery and the Conquest of Peru , was written in a very detailed and animated way.


https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=es&u=https://www.artehistoria.com/es/contexto/descubrimiento-y-conquista-del-per%25C3%25BA&prev=search
	The Discovery and Conquest of Peru forms the third part of the Chronicle that composed Pedro Cieza de León


https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=es&tl=en&u=https%3A%2F%2Fes.wikipedia.org%2Fwiki%2FDiego_de_Trujillo
	 Diego de Trujillo ( Trujillo , 1505 - Cuzco , December 20 , 1575 ) was a Spanish conquistador and chronicler . He was the author of a Relation of the Discovery of the Kingdom of Peru (Seville, 1948), a pleasant account of the conquest of Peru , which spans from the beginning of Francisco Pizarro's third voyage in 1530 to the entrance to Cuzco at the end of 1533, events of those who was an eyewitness. 

	 ...The relation of the discovery of the kingdom of Peru remained unpublished for nearly 400 years, being cataloged as an anonymous author. In 1934 it was found by Raúl Porras Barrenechea in the Library of the Royal Palace of Madrid. Said Peruvian historian subjected him to an exhaustive study, determining that its author was a Spanish soldier participant in the conquest of Peru, named Diego de Trujillo, whose life he reconstructed. It was published in 1948 in Seville , edited by Porras himself, with a prologue and notes.

	The story has its value as narrative and geographic history of the conquest. The author claims to have written it in his capacity as an eyewitness to the events, accompanying his countryman, the captain and ahead of Francisco Pizarro. But the work also has some literary traces, as Luis Alberto Sánchez points out:

	    His chronicle written with donosura, is an invitation to curiosity and even to joy, for the amenity with which he relates. There are in them such graphic phrases as "We did not pretend but to find where to eat", or that the Indians "squeaked like cats and monkeys" underlined by Porras, indicative of a congenital literary vocation, superior to that of many chroniclers of your time There are episodes, such as that of the arrival in Caxas, of such freshness that Jerez would not have disdained to sign it, and even the Inca Garcilaso would have considered himself satisfied by taking it for himself. 1


what's up with that?


count four so far:

original popular work from 1534 in Seville, attributed either to Xeres or de Mena


"Relacion del Primer Descubrimiento de la Costa y Mar del Sur", I guess so far still anonymous


"The discovery and conquest of Peru", attributed either to Eteste or de Leon


"Relation of the Discovery of the Kingdom of Peru", attributed to Diego de Trujillo


Diego and Eteste ones said to have been discovered in 20th century


wikipedia says something funny happened to a manuscript of Pedro's Relacion too:


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pedro_Pizarro
	Based on his personal observation from 1531 to 1555, Pedro Pizarro wrote a chronicle of the Spanish conquest of Peru, which he completed in 1571 under the title Relación del descubrimiento y conquista de los reinos del Perú ("Relation of the discovery and conquest of the kingdoms of Peru").[7] The manuscript of Relación that was at the National Library of Spain, however, been lost and the only remaining copy is located at The Huntington Library.[10] The work remained in manuscript until its inclusion in the fifth volume of the Colección de documentos inéditos para la historia de España, published in 1844 in Madrid. 



...

"Guns, Germs, and Steel" sources:


http://www.empirestatelymediseaseassociation.org/BOOKS/1FREE-books/GUNS-GERMS-AND-STEEL.pdf
	...What unfolded that day at Cajamarca is well known, because it was recorded in writing by many of the Spanish participants. To get a flavor of those events, let us relive them by weaving together excerpts from eyewitness accounts by six of Pizarro's companions

	...My account of Pizarro's capture of Atahuallpa combines the eyewitness accounts by Francisco Pizarro's brothers Hernando Pizarro and Pedro Pizarro and by Pizarro's companions Miguel de Estete, Cristobal de Mena, Ruiz de Arce, and Francisco de Xerez. The accounts by Hernando Pizarro, Miguel de Estete, and Francisco de Xerez have been translated by Clements Markham, Reports on the Discovery of Peru, Hakluyt Society, 1st ser., vol. 47 (New York, 1872); Pedro Pizarro's account, by Philip Means, Relation of the Discovery and Conquest of the Kingdoms of Peru (New York: Cortes Society, 1921); and Cristobal de Mena's account, by Joseph Sinclair, The Conquest of Peru, as Recorded by a Member of the Pizarro Expedition (New York, 1929). The account by Ruiz de Arce was reprinted in Boletin de la Real Academia de Historia (Madrid) 102:327-84 (1933).



https://books.google.com/books/about/Reports_on_the_Discovery_of_Peru.html?id=omcMAAAAIAAJ
	Reports on the Discovery of Peru

	Hakluyt Society, 1872

	...The narrative of Xeres appears to have been printed at Seville in 1534

	...But he has given much increased value to his work, by embodying in it the report by Miguel Astete, another eyewitness, of the expedition of Hernando Pizarro, to the famous temple of Pachacamac

	...The letter of Hernand Pizarro to the Royal Audience of Santo Domingo, which follows the narrative of Xeres ...goes over exactly the same ground as the Reports of Xeres and Astete, it is peculiarly valuable as containing the observations of the man of highest rank in the expedition who could write


Xeres/de Meno/Anonymous up to pg 74

Etente pg 74 to 115

Hernando pg 115 to end


Etente doesn't have an account of the battle in this book


Hernando's account of the battle:

https://books.google.com/books?id=omcMAAAAIAAJ&pg=PA117
	...He smiled like a man who did not think so much of us. The Captain told me that, until I came, he had not been able to get him to speak, but that one of his chiefs had answered for him, while he always kept his head down. He was seated in all the majesty of command, surrounded by all his women, and with many chiefs near him. ...At sunset I said that I wished to go, and asked him to tell me what to say to the Governor. He replied that he would come to see him the following morning

	...In the morning he sent messengers to put off his visit until the afternoon; and these messengers, in conversing with some Indian girls in the service of the Christians, who were their relations, told them to run away because Atabaliva was coming that afternoon to attack the Christians and kill them.

	...The Governor had ordered his toops to be distributed in the three halls (galpones) which were in the open courtyard, in the form of a triangle; and he ordered them to be mounted and armed until the intensions of Atabaliva were known.

	...He took with him about five or six thousand Indians without arms, except that, under their shirts, they had small darts and slings with stones.

	He came in a litter, and before him went three or four hundred Indians in liveries, cleaning the straws from the road and singing. Then came Atabaliva in the midst of his chiefs and principal men, the greatest among them being also borne on men's shoulders. When they entered the open space, twelve or fifteen Indians went up to the little fortress that was there and occupied it, taking possession with a banner fixed on a lance. When Atabaliva had advanced to the centre of the open space, he stopped, and a Dominican Friar, who was with the Governor, came forward to tell him, on the part of the Governor, that he waited for him in his lodging, and that he was sent to speak with him. The Friar then told Atabaliva that he was a Priest, and that he was sent there to teach the things of the Faith, if they should desire to be Christians. He showed Atabaliva a book which he carried in his hands, and told him that that book contained the things of God. Atabaliva asked for the book, and threw it on the ground, saying:--"I will not leave this place until you have restored all that you have taken in my land. I know well what you are, and what you have come for." Then he rose up in his litter, and addressed his men, and there were murmurs among them and calls to those who were armed. The Friar went to the Governor and reported what was being done, and that no time was to be lost. The Governor sent to me; and I had arranged with the Captain of the artillery that, when a sign was given, he should discharge his pieces, and that, on hearing the reports, all the troops should come forth at once. This was done, and as the Indians were unarmed, they were defeated without danger to any Christians. Those who carried the litter, and the chiefs who surrounded Atabaliva, were all killed, falling round him. The Governor came out and seized Atabaliva, and, in protecting him, he received a knife-cut from a Christian in the hand. The troops continued the pursuit as far as the place where the armed Indians were stationed, who made no resistance whatever, because it was now night.



trying to get Ruiz de Arce to work in google translate:

http://www.cervantesvirtual.com/descargaPdf/relacion-de-los-servicios-en-indias-de-don-juan-ruiz-de-arce-conquistador-del-peru/
	Having finished drinking we asked for permission and he begged us to stay one of us with him, we answered that we would not dare to do it because we did not bring a license from the governor and if we did that we would be angry. Then he told us that we were going to see the governor another day and before we left, he begged us to attack a cavalry, which wanted a lot of hair to run, then one of the comrades attacked a cavalry two or three times and were many Indians All around us looking between some junqueras that were very long and many, just as a cavalry attacked thirty or forty Indians who were there, where the cavalry went and then as we were commanded to do justice to them and cut off their heads. And he himself was very angry with his captains because they had not killed us all before we got to where he was. They answered that because they did not flee where the governor was, they had not killed us and because another day they thought everyone would take us, at hands, they would have let us pass where they were, they answered that because they did it and then they started hazer his esquadrones and midnight Abaxo begins to walk through his squires and settle in the countryside, around the town that night and another day did not come but Indians. In such a way that the cracked yarn broke.

	The town of Caxamarca is in this way is on a slope of a mountain In the mountains is a fortress, the town is between the rooms Where we stand and the fortress, there will be three rooms, each room would be of twenty-two steps; this goes in tiangolo Between room and apartment Abaxava a street From the village to enter. In the plaza between these rooms the corners that came from the two rooms that went out into the field, and a wall made of corner corner wall. In the middle of this wall there was a magic tower, served from outside, we arrived at this village on a Friday at midday Atabalica came another day. Saturday that there were two hours of sun to get benia this way. In a few rasas, two gentlemen with him in two other litters, came on the shoulders of Indians, they came before the thousand Indians Of livery as of game of axes. These came ahead cleaning the way and with much music and ansi entered the square through a door that was at a corner of a room, we were in this way In each room twenty of a cavalry Between one room and another was a bucket In this cube was the governor standing with twenty pawns had taken the streets that abaxavan the town and the other door that the corner of the whole apartment had been arranged as the governor made a sign we all went out in droves. Atabalica entered the square with so much power that it was something to see In the middle of the square stood, as the governor saw that Enbiole a friar to come later to speak with the governor to get out more of the people. The friar went and said these words Atabalica the governor is waiting for you to have dinner and he begs you to go because he did not have dinner without you. He answered I had stolen the land where you had come and now I am waiting for dinner not to go from here if you do not bring me all the gold and silver and slaves and clothes that you bring me and you have and not bringing it I have to kill everyone. Then the friar answered him and Dixo watches Atabalica that God does not send that, but that we love ourselves. Then Atabalica asked him who is that god? The friar gave him the one who made you and all of us, and this I tell you what he says here escripto In this book. Then the Atabalica asked for the book and the friar gave it to him and as Atabalica saw the book he threw it out for mocking the friar, he took his book and returned to where the governor was crying and calling God, and then the governor made the sign that it was agreed and as we saw the sign we went out with a very loud scream and we gave in them and was so much fear that they flew up on top of each other in such a way that they made mountains that were drowning each other and in the wall that surrounded the square I charge so many people of Indians on it that they demolished it and made a wicket of up to thirty paces there, many people fled and all the rest of the cavalry went out into the field after them. There was a flat field. From a few plains killed many Indians confessed by the mouth of Atabalica that we had died In that battle seven thousand Indians. There were two hours of hard sun the battle two hours. It was agreed that if the governor were to take the pawns away from the cavalry for Atabalica and they would not harm him so that it would be saved by going to the cavalry and breaking with the Indians, get in the governor with the pawns behind them, and reach the adas, where Atabalica came and learn it and take it and put it in a bucket Walking in the cavalry Swinging through the vega hera and at night they play a trumpet that we would pick up the real one and when we came we went to Dalle to the governor the norabuena of the vitoria and we went to where Atabalica was and there was a great fear that he thought we were going to kill him and being with that fear he called the tongue and said tell these Christians not to kill me and give me this house where we are in gold, the house would be twenty feet long was fifteen feet wide, and what he said was answered, not only would we give him his life, but if he did what he said we would leave him and his land empaz I will give a hand above what he said that he had said that Daria.



Pedro's account of the battle in his book:

https://archive.org/stream/relationofdiscov00pizauoft/relationofdiscov00pizauoft_djvu.txt
	Relation of the discovery and the conquest of the kingdoms of Peru. Translated into English and annotated by Philip Ainsworth Means

	...Then, having arrived, Hernando de Soto found him [Atabalipa], as I have said, with all the troops in readiness for war. Atabalipa was in this small house, as I have said, seated on his duo (duho, seat) ; a very fine thin mantle through which one could see was held by two women before him, and they covered him up with it so that no one should see him, for it is the custom of some of these Lords not to be seen save rarely by their vassals. When Soto had arrived upon his horse, like the rest, he [Atabalipa] ordered them to lower the mantle, and he listened to all that Soto said to him, which was all that he had been ordered to say, all of which was made clear to him by the interpreter Don Martinillo, one of the boys already mentioned. After having heard the message he replied, and he told Hernando de Soto to return and announce to the Marquis and the other Christians that on the morrow he would go to the place where they were, and [he ordered that] they were to make reparation to him for the disrespect they had shown in taking some mattings from a room where his father, Guaina Capa, had been wont to sleep when he was alive, and that they were to repay all that they had taken between the bay of Sant Matheo and that spot, as well as all the food they had eaten, [and such repayment] they were to hold in readiness against his coming. Hearing this, Hernando de Soto was dismayed, and on a plain which was there, he [Atabalipa] caused a skirmish to be fought against the cavalry, and when the cavalry had barely come up to where the Indians were posted, the Indians rose up and fled in fear. When Soto had returned to Caxamalca, Atabalipa commanded that those Indians who had arisen and had been afraid should be put to death, as well as those of their caciques who were there and their children and women, so as to fill his troops with fear and so that none of them should take flight when the time came to fight with the Christians.

	...After dawn, the Marquis Don Francisco Pizarro arranged his troops, dividing the cavalry into two portions of which he gave the command of one to Hernando Pizarro and the command of the other to Hernando de Soto. In like manner he divided the infantry, he himself taking one part and giving the other to his brother Juan Pizarro. At the same time, he ordered Pedro de Candia with two or three infantrymen to go with trumpets to a small fort which is in the plaza of Caxamalca and to station themselves there with a small piece of ordnance which he carried in the field, and [it was arranged] that when all the Indians, and Atabalipa with them, had entered the plaza, they [the Spaniards] would make them [Candia and his men] a signal, after which the firing should begin and the trumpets should sound, and at the sound of the trumpets the cavalry should dash out of the large galpon where they were in readiness, and wherein many more of them might have been hidden than there were in their troop.

	...Then, having dined, finishing about the hour of high mass, he [Atabalipa] began to draw up his men and to approach nearer to Caxamalca. When his squadrons were formed in such wise that they covered the fields, and when he himself had mounted into a litter, he began to march; before him went two thousand Indians who swept the road by which he travelled, and these were followed by the warriours, half of whom were marching in the fields on one side of him and half on the other side, and neither half entered upon the road itself at all. In like manner, he bore with him the Lord of Chincha, 66 riding upon a litter, which seemed to his men a wonderful honour, for no Indian, no matter how great a Lord he might be, ever appeared before him [the Inga] save with a burden upon his back and with naked feet. Then, too, so great was the amount of furniture of gold and silver which they bore, that it was a marvel to observe how the sun glinted upon it. Likewise, there marched before Atabalipa many Indians singing and dancing. 

	...Then the [Indian] troops having arrived at the entrance of the plaza, the squadrons began to enter it to the accompaniment of great songs, and thus entering they occupied every part of the plaza.

	The Marquis Don Francisco Pizarro, observing how Atabalipa had now drawn near to the plaza, sent Padre Fray Vicente de Valverde, first bishop of Cuzco, Hernando de Aldama, a good soldier, and Don Martinillo, the interpreter, with orders to go and speak to Atabalipa and require it of him in the name of God and of the King that he subject himself to the law of our Lord Jesus Christ and to the service of His Majesty, and [to say] that the Marquis would regard him as a brother, and would not consent that any injury be done to him nor any damage be done to his land. When the Padre had arrived at the litter in which Atabalipa travelled, he spoke to him and told him the things he had come to say, and he preached unto him the matters per- taining to our holy faith, they being declared [unto the Inga] by the interpreter. The Padre carried in his hands a breviary from which he read the matters which he preached. Ataba- lipa asked him for it, and he [Valverde] clos- ing it, handed it to him [Atabalipa]. When he had it in his hands he did not know how to open it, and he threw it upon the ground. He [Valverde] called upon Aldana to draw near to him [Atabalipa] and give him the sword, and Aldana drew it and brandished it, but did not wish to plunge it into the Inga.

	When this occurred he told them to get them thence, as they were mere scurvy rogues, for he was going to have all of them put to death. Hearing this, the Padre returned and related all to the Marquis, and Atabalipa entered the plaza with all his pomp and the Lord of Chincha in his train. When they had entered the plaza and had seen that no Spaniard made his appearance, he asked his captains where were these Christians who failed to appear, and they said to him: Lord, they are in hiding for very fear. The Marquis Don Francisco Pizarro seeing the two litters did not know which was that of Atabalipa, so he ordered Juan Pizarro his brother to attack one with the infantry and he would attack the other. This being ordered, he made the signal to Candia, who began to fire and at the same time caused the trumpets to sound, and the cavalry came out in troop formation, and the Marquis with the infantry, as has been said, and it all happened in such wise that, with the noise of the firing, and the blowing of the trumpets and the bells on the horses, the Indians were thrown into confusion and were cut to pieces. 

	The Spaniards attacked them and began to slay them, and so great was the fear which the Indians had, and so great was their anxiety to flee, that, not being able to pass through the gateway [of the plaza], they threw down a portion of the wall around the plaza, a portion more than two thousand paces long and more than an estado high. The cavalry pursued them as far as the baths where they wrought great havoc among them, and would have wrought much more but for the coming of night. To return now to Don Francisco Pizarro and his brother, they sallied, as has been said, with the infantry, and the Marquis attacked the litter of Atabalipa, and his brother that of the Lord of Chincha; [the latter of] whom they killed there in his litter, and the same fate would have been Atabalipa's had not the Marquis been there, because they were unable to pull him out of the litter, and although they slew the Indians who bore it, others at once took their places and held it aloft, and in this manner they spent a great time in overcoming and killing Indians, and out of weariness, a Spaniard made as if to give him [Atabalipa] a blow with a knife in order to kill him, and the Marquis Don Francisco Pizarro prevented it, and by his prevention the Marquis received a wound in the hand from the Spaniard who wished to slay Atabalipa. Because of this, the Marquis gave loud cries, saying: Let no one wound the Indian on pain of death. Hearing these words seven or eight Spaniards were spurred on, and they rushed upon the litter from one side, and, with great efforts, they turned it over on its side, and thus was Atabalipa made a prisoner, and the Marquis carried him off [with him] to his room, and there they set a guard over him who watched him day and night. Then, night having come, all the Spaniards gathered together and gave many thanks to our Lord for the mercies he had vouchsafed to them, and they were well content with having made prisoner the Lord, because, had they not taken him so, the land would not have been won as it was won. 67 


"de Mena's" account (written anonymously):

https://books.google.com/books?id=dW57AAAAMAAJ

https://babel.hathitrust.org/cgi/pt?id=mdp.39015054032365;view=1up;seq=9
	The conquest of Peru as recorded by a member of the Pizarro expedition.

	Sinclair, Joseph H


	...The New York Public Library possesses in the anonymous "La Conquista del Peru" an exceedingly rare and valuable printed book -- one of the two known copies.

	Besides its rarity this book is valuable for being the second printed account so far known of the conquest of Peru, the first existing printed work on this subject being the German Work (also in The New York Public Library) entited "Newe Zeytung | aus Hispanien und | Italien | Mense Februario | 1534. |" which is thought to have been printed in Nuremberg.

	"La Conquista del Peru" was printed in Seville in the month of April, 1534, by the printer Bartolome Perez, and the author is unknown. He states that he embarked with Francisco Pizarro in Panama, February, 1531, and accompanied him during the stirring events which termined in the execution of the last Incao ruler, Atahuallpa, and was one of the twenty-five permitted to return to Spain shortly after that event.


	...Hernando Pizarro and Hermando de Soto asked permission of the GOvernor to let them go with five or six horsemen and with an interpreter to speak with the Cacique Atabalip and to see how he had arranged his camp. The Governor allowed them to go but much against his will. They went to the camp which was a league distant. The entire plain where teh Cacique was camped was closed from one side to the other by squadrons of pikemin and halberdiers and bowmen, and there was another squadron of Indians with arrows and slings, and others with clubs and sticks shod with metal. The Christians passed in the midst of those who stood as statues. And they arrived in the presence of the Cacique and they found that he was seated at the door of his house with many women around him for no man dared to be near. ANd Hernando de Soto rode to him horseback and he [the Cacique] was like a statue and he rode so near that the royal headdress which the Cacique wore on his forehead touched the horse's nose. And even then the Cacique did not move. Then Captain Hernando do Soto took from his finger a ring and gave it to him as a token of peace and love from the Christians. He acceted this with little sign of appreciation. Then Hernando Pizarro who had remained in the background to place three or four horsemen at a gate where there was a bad passage arrived and brought at the haunches of him [the cacique] and all his army came close to the Cacique and told him to raise his head which he kept bowed low and to speak to him for he was his friend and he had come to see him and begged him to come tommorrow to see the Governor who was very anxious to see him. The Cacique replied with his head [still] bowed that he would go to see him to-morrow.

	...Hernando de Soto ran his horse many times full speed toward a squadron of pikemen and these stepped back a step. After the Chrsitians had departed, these [pikemen] paid dearly for the movement, for the Cacique ordered them and all their wives and children to be beheaded, saying that they should move forward and not back and that the same punishment would be handed out to all who retreated. The Captains returned to the Governor and they told him all that had taken place with the Cacique and that it seemed to them that there were 40,000 fighting men and they told this to encourage their forces for in reality there were more than 80,000 and they related what the Cacique had told them.

	...The next morning there was nothing but the coming and going of messengers to the camp of Atabalipa. And one time it was said he was to come armed, another time they said he was to come unarmed. The Governor sent word that he should come as he wished, that his men looked well with their arms.

	At noon Atabalipa began to leave his camp accompanied by so many people that the whole plain was filled with them and all those Indians wore a kind of crown of gold and silver on their heads. It seemed that all were coming in their gala clothes. At the moment of Vespers they began their entry into the village and there the Cacique waited a little while for his people so that all should come together. When all had arrived and his commands were obeyed, he moved at the head and he arrived [seated] on his palanquin in the center of the square although with considerable misgivings. The governor then sent a man to him asking him to come to where he was, assuring him that he would suffer no harm of any kind nor insult, that he should come without fear although the Cacique did not seem afraid.

	The Cacique had in front of him dressed in livery 400 Indians removing from his path all the stones and sticks which they found in the road along which they were carrying the Cacique in his palanquin and these 400 men carried secretly under their livery clubs with a thick knob at the end, and even doublets [jubones] of strong arms and slings with selected stones to be used in these. The Governor had his men stationed in three large houses each one of which had more than 200 windows and 20 doors. In one of these houses was stationed Hernando Pizarro with 14 or 15 horsement; in another Captain Hernando do Soto with another 15 or 16 horsemen and in another house Benalcazar with as many more or less. In another house was the Governor with two or three horsemen and 20 or 25 footsoldiers. All the other men were on guard at the doors so that no one could enter a very strong fort in the middle of the square in which was stationed Pedro de Candia, captain of His Majesty, with 8 or 9 musketeers and 4 small cannon because he was guarding the fort at the command of the GOvernor. The Governor commanded that if as many as ten Indians should ascend to it to permit them but no more.

	When the Cacique arrived in that place he asked where the Christians were for all were concealed and not a man was in sight. At this moment 7 or 8 Indians ascended to the fort. And a captain with a very long spear on which was a flag made a sign to bring the arms because the pikeman who was coming behind was carrying the spears of those who were ahead. In this way they seemed to be without arms and yet had them. And a priest of the order of Santo Domingo with a crucifix in his hands desiring to speak to him of the things of God went to speak to him and told him that the Christians were his friends and that the Governor loved him very much and that he should enter his house to see him. The Cacique replied that he would advance no further until the Christians had returned all they had taken in his country and after that he would do waht he wished. The priest, not paying any attention to this remark, with a book which he held in his hands began to say the things of God which seemed fitting to him; but he did not care to listen and asking for the book the priest gave it to him thinking he would like to kiss it. And he took it and threw it over his retinue and the boy who acted as interpreter and was there translating these remarks ran after it and took it and gave it to the priest; and the priest turned then, calling and crying out "Come out, come out, Christians, and attend to these unfriendly dogs who do not care for the things of God. That Cacique has thrown on the ground the book of our sacred law." And in this moment a signal was given to the artillerymen to fire into the midst of them and they let go two salvos all they could do and the Indians who had climbed to the fort did not descend in the way they had ascended but rather jumped down. The cavalrymen who were in the three houses seeing this came out as if at a given signal and so also the Governor with the infantrymen who were with him and he went straight to the palanquin on which the Cacique was seated. And many of the infantry men who were with him withdrew a little from him, seeing that the Indians against him were very numerous. And in order to avenge himself more on them with the few men at his disposal, the Governor came to the palanquin although they did not let him reach it [without opposition] and many Indians had their hands cut off and with their shoulders were supporting the palanquin of their master. His body guard did not profit him because soon all were dead and their master a prisoner of the Governor.

	With the few infantrymen that he had and with the cavalry, he sallied out into the plain and many of them fell upon the Indians who were in flight and who were so numerous that in their flight they knocked down a wall 6 feet wide and more than 15 feet long and of the height of a man. Here many horsemen fell and in a space of two hours (during which night had fallen) all of the mass of Indians were routed. And in truth it was not by means of our forces for we were few in number but by the grace of God which is great.

	That day the dead in the plain amounted to six or seven thousand Indians not counting the many others who had their arms cut off and other wounds and that night the cavalry and infantry marched through the village because we saw five or six thousand Indians on a mountain which rose above the village and we kept on guard against them. In order that the Christians should collect in the camp, the Governor ordered the artillery to give a salvo and soon there collected the cavalry which was moving about on the plain thinking the Indians were attacking the camp and the infantry likewise, more than four or five hours of the night having passed by.

	The Governor was very pleased over the victory which God our Lord had given us and he asked the Cacique why he was sad and told him not to be sorrowful because we Christians had not been born in his country but far from it and that in all the lands through which we had come there were very great men and all these had been made friends and subjects of the Emperor for war and peace and that he should not be frightened at having been taken prisoner by us. He answered half-smiling that he was not sad about that, but because he had expected to make the Governor a prisoner and that the reverse had come true and for this reason he was sad. But as a favor of the Governor asked that if there was nearby one of his Indians to order him to come as he would like to speak to him. The Governor soon ordered two Indians to be brought, the leading ones of those captured in the battle. The Cacique asked them if there were many dead. They replied that the plain was covered with the dead. Then he sent word to his people not to flee but to come and serve him because he was not dead but was in the power of the Christians and it seemed to him that the Christians were good people and therefore he commanded that they should come to serve them. The Governor asked the interpreter what he had said. The interpreter told him all he had said. The Governor said he had more to say to them, and making a Cross he gave it to the Cacique saying that all his people both those here and far distant should take each one in his hands a cross like that and that the Christian cavalry and infantry to-morrow would march out into the plain and would kill all they found without the sign of the cross. And the next morning all marched out into the plain in great good order and found many squadrons of Indians. The nearest of these in very great fear carried crosses in their hands.






"guns, germs and steel" author isn't exactly "weaving together excerpts from eyewitness accounts by six of Pizarro's companions" of the battle, he's taking quotes from accounts of three named authors, two being obvious liars and one who barely talked about it, two anonymous books, and one quote that's been plagiarized. 


how "guns germs and steel" author weaves the accounts:


https://www.bxscience.edu/ourpages/auto/2014/5/2/72947755/cajamarca.htm
	"Behind Atahuallpa came two other litters and two hammocks, in which were some high chiefs, then several squadrons of Indians with crowns of gold and silver. These Indian squadrons began to enter the plaza to the accompaniment of great songs, and thus entering they occupied every part of the plaza. In the meantime all of us Spaniards were waiting ready, hidden in a courtyard, full of fear. Many of us urinated without noticing it, out of sheer terror. On reaching the center of the plaza, Atahuallpa remained in his litter on high, while his troops continued to file in behind him.

	"Governor Pizarro now sent Friar Vicente de Valverde to go speak to Atahuallpa, and to require Atahuallpa in the name of God and of the King of Spain that Atahuallpa subject himself to the law of our Lord Jesus Christ and to the service of His Majesty the King of Spain. Advancing with a cross in one hand and the Bible in the other hand, and going among the Indian trool3s up to the place where Atahuallpa was, the Friar thus addressed him: 'I am a Priest of God, and I teach Christians the things of God, and in like manner I come to teach you. What I teach is that which God says to using this Book. Therefore, on the part of God and of the Christians, I beseech you to be their friend, for such is God's will, and it will be for your good.'

	"Atahuallpa asked for the Book, that he might look at it, and the Friar gave it to him closed. Atahuallpa did not know how-to open the Book, and the Friar was extending his arm to do so, when Atahuallpa, in great anger, gave him a blow on the arm, not wishing that it should be opened. Then he opened it himself, and, without any astonishment at the letters and paper he threw it away from him five or six paces, his face a deep crimson.

	"The Friar returned to Pizarro, shouting, 'Come out! Come out, Christians! Come at these enemy dogs who reject the things of God. That tyrant has thrown my book of holy law to the ground! Did you not see what happened? Why remain polite and servile toward this over-proud dog when the plains are full of Indians? March out against him, for I absolve you!'

	"The governor then gave the signal to Candia, who began to fire off the guns. At the same time the trumpets were sounded, and the armored Spanish troops, both cavalry and infantry, sallied forth out of their hiding places straight into the mass of unarmed Indians crowding the square, giving the Spanish battle cry, 'Santiago!' W had placed rattles on the horses to terrify the Indians. The booming of the guns, the blowing of the trumpets, and the rattles on the horses threw the Indians into panicked confusion. The Spaniards fell upon them and began to cut them to pieces. The Indians were so filled with fear that they climbed on top of one another, formed mounds, and suffocated each other. Since they were unarmed, they were attacked without danger to any Christian. The cavalry rode them down, killing and wounding, and following in pursuit. The infantry made so good an assault on those that remained that in a short time most of them were put to the sword.

	"The Governor himself took his sword and dagger, entered the thick of the Indians with the Spaniards who were with him, and with great bravery reached Atahuallpa's litter. He fearlessly grabbed Atahuallpa's left arm and shouted 'Santiago!' but he could not pull Atahuallpa out of his litter because it was held up high. Although we killed the Indians who held the litter, others at once took their places and held it aloft, and in this manner we spent a long time in overcoming and killing Indians. Finally seven or eight Spaniards on horseback spurred on their horses, rushed upon the litter from one side, and with great effort they heaved it over its side. In that way Atahuallpa was captured, and the Governor took Atahuallpa to his lodging. The Indians carrying the litter, and those escorting Atahuallpa, never abandoned him: all died around him.

	"The panic-stricken Indians remaining in the square, terrified at the firing of the guns and at the horses-something they had never seen-tried to flee from the square by knocking down a stretch of wall and running out onto the plain outside. Our cavalry jumped the broken wall and charged into the plain, shouting, 'Chase those with the fancy clothes! Don't let any escape! Spear them!' All of the other Indian soldiers whom Atahuallpa had brought were a mile from Cajamarca ready for battle, but not one made a move, and during all this not one Indian raised a weapon against a Spaniard. When the squadrons of Indians who had remained in the plain outside the town saw the other Indians fleeing and shouting, most of them too panicked and fled. It was an astonishing sight, for the whole valley for 15 or 20 miles was completely filled with Indians. Night had already fallen, and our cavalry were continuing to spear Indians in the fields, when we heard a trumpet calling for us to reassemble at camp.

	"If night had not come on, few out of the more than 40,000 Indian troops would have been left alive. Six or even thousand Indians lay dead, and many more had their arms cut off and other wounds. Atahuallpa himself admitted that we had killed 7,000 of his men in that battle. The man killed in one of the litters was his minister, the lord of Chincha, of whom he was very fond. All those Indians who bore Atahuallpa's litter appeared to be high chiefs and councilors [sic]. They were all killed, as well as those Indians who were carried in the other litters and hammocks. The lord of Cajamarca was also killed, and others, but their numbers were so great that they could not be counted, for all who came in attendance on Atahuallpa were great lords. It was extraordinary to see so powerful a ruler captured in so short a time, when he had come with such a mighty army. Truly, it was not accomplished by our own forces, for there were so few of us. It was by the grace of God, which is great.

	"Atahuallpa's robes had been torn off when the Spaniards pulled him out of his litter. The Governor ordered clothes to be brought to him, and when Atahuallpa was dressed, the Governor ordered Atahuallpa to sit near him and soothed his rage and agitation at finding himself so quickly fallen from his high estate. The Governor said to Atahuallpa, 'Do not take it as an insult that you have been defeated and taken prisoner, for with the Christians who come with me, though so few in number, I have conquered greater kingdoms than yours, and have defeated other more powerful lords than you, imposing upon them the dominion of the Emperor, whose vassal I am, and who is King of Spain and of the universal world. We come to conquer this land by his command, that all may come to a knowledge of God and of His Holy Catholic Faith; and by reason of our good mission, God, the Creator of heaven and earth and of all things in them, permits this, in order that you may know Him and come out from the bestial and diabolical life that you lead. It is for this reason that we, being so few in number, subjugate that vast host. When you have seen the errors in which you live, you will understand the good that we have done you by coming to your land by order of his Majesty the King of Spain. Our Lord permitted that your pride should be brought low and that no Indian should be able to offend a Christian.'

	Let us now trace the chain of causation in this extraordinary confrontation, beginning with the immediate events. When Pizarro and Atahuallpa met at Calamarca, why did Pizarro capture Atahuallpa and kill so many of his followers. Instead of Atahuallpa's vastly more numerous forces capturing and killing Pizarro? After all, Pizarro had only 62 soldiers mounted on horses, along with 106 foot soldiers, while Atahuallpa commanded an army of about 80,000. As for the antecedents of those events, how did Atahuallpa come to be at Cajamarca at all? How did Pizarro come to be there to capture him, instead of Atahuallpa's coming to Spain to capture King Charles I? Why did Atahuallpa walk into what seems to us, with the gift of hindsight, to have been such a transparent trap? Did the factors acting in the encounter of Atahuallpa and Pizarro also play a broader role in encounters between Old World and New World peoples and between other peoples?

	Why did Pizarro capture Atahuallpa? Pizarro's military advantages lay in the Spaniards' steel swords and other weapons, steel armor, guns, and horses. To those weapons, Atahuallpa's troops, without animals on which to ride into battle, could oppose only stone, bronze, or wooden clubs, maces, and hand axes, plus slingshots and quilted armor. Such imbalances of equipment were decisive in innumerable other confrontations of Europeans with Native Americans and other peoples.

	...We easily forget that horses and rifles were originally unknown to Native Americans. They were brought by Europeans and proceeded to transform the societies of Indian tribes that acquired them.

	...The novelty of horses, steel weapons, and guns undoubtedly paralyzed the Incas at Cajamarca

	...In the Spanish conquest of the Incas, guns played only a minor role. The guns of those times (so-called harquebusiers) were difficult to load and fire, and Pizarro had only a dozen of them. They did produce a big psycho- logical effect of those occasions when they managed to fire. Far more important were the Spaniards' steel swords, lances, and daggers, strong sharp weapons that slaughtered thinly armored Indians. In contrast, Indian blunt clubs, while capable of battering and wounding Spaniards and their horses, rarely succeeded in killing them. The Spaniards' steel or chain mail armor and, above all, their steel helmets usually provided an effective defense against club blows, while the Indians' quilted armor offered no protection against steel weapons.

	The tremendous advantage that the Spaniards gained from their horses leaps out of the eyewitness accounts. Horsemen could easily outride Indian sentries before the sentries had time to warn Indian troops behind them, and could ride down and kill Indians on foot. The shock of a horse's charge, its maneuverability, the speed of attack that it permitted, and the raised and protected fighting platform that it provided left foot soldiers nearly helpless in the open. Nor was the effect of horses due only to the terror that they inspired in soldiers fighting against them for the first time. 

	...Horses permitted people possessing them to cover far greater distances than was possible on foot, to attack by surprise, and to flee before a superior defending force could be gathered. Their role at Cajamarca thus exemplifies a military weapon that remained potent for 6,000 years, until the early 20th century, and that was eventually applied on all the continents. Not until the First World War did the military dominance of cavalry finally end. When we consider the advantages that Spaniards derived from horses, steel weapons, and armor against foot soldiers without metal, it should no longer surprise us that Spaniards consistently won battles against enormous odds.

	...How did Atahuallpa come to be at Cajamarca? Atahuallpa and his army came to be at Cajamarca because they had just won decisive battles in a civil war that left the Incas divided and vulnerable. Pizarro quickly appreciated those divisions and exploited them. The reason for the civil war was that an epidemic of smallpox, spreading overland among South American Indians after its arrival with Spanish settlers in Panama and Colombia, had killed the Inca emperor Huayna Capac and most of his court around 1526, and then immediately killed his designated heir, Ninan Cuyuchi. Those deaths precipitated a contest for the throne between Atahuallpa and his half brother Huascar. If it had not been for the epidemic, the Spaniards would have faced a united empire.

	...Why did Atahuallpa walk into the trap? In hindsight, we find it astonishing that Atahuallpa marched into Pizarro's obvious trap at Cajamarca. The Spaniards who captured him were equally surprised at their success. The consequences of literacy are prominent in the ultimate explanation.

	The immediate explanation is that Atahuallpa had very little information about the Spaniards, their military power, and their intent. He derived that scant information by word of mouth, mainly from an envoy who had visited Pizarro's force for two days while it was en route inland from the coast. That envoy saw the Spaniards at their most disorganized, told Atahuallpa that they were not fighting men, and that he could tie them all up if given 200 Indians.-Understandably, it never occurred to Atahuallpa that the Spaniards were formidable and would attack him without provocation.

	...In short, literacy made the Spaniards heirs to a huge body of knowledge about human behavior and history. By contrast, not only did Atahuallpa have no conception of the Spaniards themselves, and no personal experience of any other invaders from overseas, but he also had not even heard (or read) of similar threats to anyone else, anywhere else, anytime previously in history. That gulf of experience encouraged Pizarro to set his trap and Atahuallpa to walk into it.

	THUS, PIZARRO'S CAPTURE of Atahuallpa illustrates the set of proximate factors that resulted in Europeans' colonizing the New World instead of Native Americans' colonizing Europe. Immediate reasons for Pizarro's success included military technology based on guns, steel weapons, and horses; infectious diseases endemic in Eurasia; European maritime technology; the centralized political organization of European state and writing. The title of this book will serve as shorthand for those proximate factors, which also enabled modern Europeans to conquer peoples of other continents. Long before anyone began manufacturing guns and steel, others of those same factors had led to the expansions of some non-European peoples, as we shall see in later chapters.

	But we are still left with the fundamental question why all those immediate advantages came to lie more with Europe than with the New World. Why weren't the Incas the ones to invent guns and steel swords, to be mounted on animals as fearsome as horses, to bear diseases to which European lacked resistance, to develop oceangoing ships and advanced political organization, and to be able to draw on the experience of thousands of years of written history?



------



Each of the soldiers under Pizarro was a witness to one of the greatest crimes in human history

who were they? What should be expected about them on average or by default? How many were literate, wealthy, poor, etc? How were they selected?


https://www.amazon.com/Men-Cajamarca-Biographical-Conquerors-Monograph/dp/0292750013
	In November 1532, a group of 168 Spaniards seized the Inca emperor Atahuallpa in the town of Cajamarca, in the northern Peruvian highlands. Their act, quickly taken as a symbol of the conquest of a vast empire, brought them unprecedented rewards in gold and silver; it made them celebrities, gave them first choice of positions of honor and power in the new Peru of the Spaniards, and opened up the possibility of a splendid life at home in Spain, if they so desired. Thus they became men of consequence, at the epicenter of a swift and irrevocable transformation of the Andean region. Yet before that memorable day in Cajamarca they had been quite unexceptional, a reasonable sampling of Spaniards on expeditions all over the Indies at the time of the great conquests.

	The Men of Cajamarca is perhaps the fullest treatment yet published of any group of early Spaniards in America. Part I examines general types, characteristics, and processes visible in the group as representative Spanish immigrants, central to the establishment of a Spanish presence in the New World’s richest land. The intention is to contribute to a changing image of the Spanish conqueror, a man motivated more by pragmatic self-interest than by any love of adventure, capable and versatile as often as illiterate and rough. Aiming at permanence more than new landfalls, these men created the governmental units and settlement distribution of much of Spanish America and set lasting patterns for a new society.

	Part II contains the men’s individual biographies, ranging from a few lines for the most obscure to many pages of analysis for the best-documented figures. The author traces the lives of the men to their beginnings in Spain and follows their careers after the episode in Cajamarca.


author is interesting:

https://books.google.com/books?id=zIK3og4-apEC&pg=PA333&lpg=PA333


wanted to be novelist or journalist at first

likes "German philosophers"

doesn't write like a spy in his memo thing I guess

has an ego, suspicious of sociologists and "uncritical" accepting historians, wrote in his mini-bio that something he wrote "had a certain impact on the field, and the passage was quoted ten years later"

so far guessing he is otherwise honest historian that propagandists would think easy to manipulate?

seems to care about things like "narrative-institutionalism" and I guess got flak for going against "narrative-institutionalism" or something like that

"When Spanish Peru came out, I was quite irritated that a couple of institutional-narrative historians saw the book as an unwelcome intrusion of the social sciences into the field."

seems to care about what "colleagues" think about him and sometimes get in fights with them

"Carassco, it is true, had a Marxist orientation common in the main Mexican school of anthropology, but taht didn't affect me, and even more importantly, it hardly affected the work except in certain interpretive paragraphs"

"Wonderful progress has been made in deciphering Mayan heiroglyphics, which are often historical/genealogical, as I had imagined they would be, and show normal warfare and dynastic politics, rather than the idealized peaceful and intellectual Maya. What rather disturbs me is th interpretation of the new information. Those most involved do have the sophistication not to take the statements about people and battles as objective fact. But elite planning and manipulation, which was definitely a factor, is taken for the whole explanation. The strong ethnic feelings and local ethnic states of which the elites were only a manifestation are virtually ignored: there is little awareness of a local ethnic group or state as the determining entity. The visual artifacts are dealt with as a complete communication system, when in fact they were only one part of a unified two-track system in which oral presentation was at least equally essential."

say anything about him? people in field around him?


"And yet maybe there will be some impact. Not long ago I got a letter from two anthropologists who basically do Meso-american archaeology, accompanied by an article they have written. They have absorbed my notion of cellular or modular organization as laid out in the Nahaus and are trying to use it instead of what has been the dominant interpretation among anthropologists, which sees the regional entities in terms of ubranization and "central place." I am delighted; I have innerly opposed these notions for a long time."

hmmm what if they *knew* he innerly opposed these notions???

no way to know for sure but if he fits in any mold its a genuine historian who is victim of attempts by fake historians to manipulate him into doing something stupid

presume a recipe for this would have to exist if there are a bunch of propagandists posing as historians and they need a protocol for what happens when a real historian shows up

maybe if can get more data later Lockhart's writings and fights with other historians could give insight on any such thing and/or give evidence of it




from his book "men of Cajamarca"

https://play.google.com/store/books/details?id=E1hfAgAAQBAJ
	Porras’s work is superb, characterized by depth, finesse, and high accuracy, for the most part. One could wish that the mores of his time and place had permitted source references. Source references in abundance will be found in the extensive, conscientious writing of José Antonio del Busto, who has published articles in various journals and reviews on perhaps half of the men, including humble ones. Busto has some sense for the social and does not knowingly distort the truth, but he also loves a colorful narrative and sometimes uses the methods of the historical novelist. The reader will find in this volume numerous challenges of factual points in Busto’s work. These are not malicious, but result from the broader documentary base and more precise social focus employed here; the author realizes that all research of this type, including his own, involves a certain irreducible minimum of error.


Lockhart on to something?


book goes over things and patterns about men of Cajamarci in general and a biograph of some of their lives specifically


	...In accordance with its double tradition, The Men of Cajamarca is in two parts. The first contains several analytical chapters on general patterns, social, collective, or organizational. The second contains short biographies of all the men, insofar as that is possible. Social scientists will probably think that Part I is the body of the work, followed by an appendix, while humanists may consider it a prologue, and the biographies the body. The author gives equal weight to both parts.


	...1.


	...Rather than narrative properly speaking, the brief calendar or summary below will be episodic. Episodes are the building blocks of the conquerors’ careers. Participation in some of them and not in others is an important part of any individual’s life pattern and sets him off in some way from other men. This effect is strongest and most visible in the case of Spaniards who had any part in capturing the Inca emperor, but it operates in many other less notable happenings as well. Thus presence at certain events becomes a diagnostic trait, and, with that, those events become an integral part of the study’s vocabulary. 

	...Balboa Sees the Pacific
	The conquest of Peru might be said to have started when Vasco Núñez de Balboa and some sixty men first glimpsed the “South Sea” in the Panama region in 1513. A few of Peru’s conquerors were already in the Isthmian area at that time, and one of them, Francisco Pizarro, was present as Balboa’s chief lieutenant.

	Balboa’s discovery brought in its wake a shift to the west, mainly carried out under Governor Pedrarias de Avila. The latter arrived in the area in 1514; the great expedition he headed included some few of the future men of Cajamarca, among them Hernando de Soto. In 1519 Pedrarias shifted the capital of Tierra Firme to the new west coast city of Panama. From that base advances were made along the coast in both directions.


Pizarro on Balboa trip discovering "South Sea", some cajamarca men already there, some under later expedition under Pedrarias (motivated by Balboa) including de Soto, Pedrarias moves capital of Tierra Firme to Panama (so closer)


	The Conquest of Nicaragua

	In the first years after Panama’s foundation the thrust north and west toward easily accessible Nicaragua was stronger than that toward the treacherous coast of South America. An expedition under Gil González de Avila, starting in 1521, explored Nicaragua, then returned. A few of that expedition’s members, probably seamen, were later to come to Peru. Just afterward perhaps a dozen future conquerors of Peru took part in some stage of the effective conquest of Nicaragua in 1523–1524, under Pedrarias’s captain, Francisco Hernández de Córdoba. Soto was a prominent leader in this movement, as was Sebastián de Benalcázar, at a little lower level.


went after Nicaragua in 1521 after moving to Panama. Some of the Cajamarca men went on expedition to Nicagaragua and a dozen took part in conquest of Nicaragua. Soto and de Benalcazar were prominent in Nicaragua conquest.


	The Discovery of Peru

	In 1524, previous attempts having led to little, Pedrarias agreed to let Captain Francisco Pizarro with his associates explore and conquer toward the “Levant,” or in the direction of present Colombia.2 A first venture produced small profit and discovered little new, probing along a coast populated mainly with enough mosquitoes “to do battle with all the armies of the Grand Turk.”3 A second expedition of 1526, in which Pizarro’s partner Almagro figured with increasing prominence as a near equal and a potential rival, advanced farther down the coast but suffered greatly from disease and hunger. For this and other reasons, very few veterans of the early expeditions took part in the actual conquest of 1531–1532—far fewer men than from Nicaragua. Late in 1526, pilot Bartolomé Ruiz reconnoitered far ahead of the main group, finding the first promising signs of the central Andean peoples and their great wealth. The whole expedition reached the settled town of Atacames (in northern Ecuador).


In 1524 set out for Peru first time, 1526 second time. First said to have done nothing (did it?). Second went farther but suffered disease/hunger. Almagro was there and become more like equal/rival of Pizarro. Bartolme Ruiz went ahead of main group and found first signs of Inca wealth.

Few of men on these went to Cajamarca (why?). Lockhart points to Nicaragua as bigger recruitment pool.

This is also where they enslaved inerpretors Fellipio and Martin which is really important (does Lockhart cover them?)


	Gallo Island and the Thirteen of Fame

	Nevertheless, the situation of the men continued to deteriorate; lacking the strength to take Atacames, they retired to desolate Gallo Island, off the far southern coast of Colombia. Complaints from there reached Governor Pedro de los Ríos (Pedrarias’s successor) in 1527, whereupon he sent out a lieutenant with orders to bring back to Panama all the men who wished to come. If any substantial number wanted to continue the venture, they could do so. Pizarro spoke for continuing, in a way simpler, more matter of fact, and at the same time more moving than is usually reported. Nor did the men express their choice so theatrically as is often thought. It was decided that some thirteen men (more or less) would stay on the nearby island of Gorgona, which was better provisioned, and await reinforcements to carry on south.4 Most of the Spaniards returned to Panama, many of them disillusioned or disaffected, but this was not the case with all. Some were wounded, or ill, and did not intend to abandon the venture permanently, as they later showed by their actions. Others were on specific missions for Pizarro, including pilot Ruiz himself.

	After a few months Ruiz returned to Gorgona with a ship and sailors, but no further reinforcements. In the first half of 1528, Pizarro, the Thirteen, and the sailors reconnoitered the Peruvian coast as far south as Santa (a third of the way down the coast of modern Peru), several times going on shore and seeing something of the magnificence of the Incan empire. South of Túmbez they picked up the Indian boys who would later interpret at Cajamarca.5 Feeling that enough had been seen to attract men and support, Pizarro returned to Panama with some gold pieces, Ilamas, and Indians.


during second expedition their strength deteriorated and they went to Gallo Island. Complaints (about what?) reached Panama and Pizarro drew a line in the sand for who should stay. Some left but wanted to come back, Ruiz and some left on specific missions for Pizzaro. Ruiz came back with sailors, and in 1528 they went into Inca empire, saw magnificence, got gold and llamas and kidnapped interpreters.


	Back to Spain

	From late 1528 until January, 1530, Pizarro was in Spain. His main business was to obtain a capitulation with the crown, granting him the governorship of Peru and the authorization to conquer it. He also recruited men for the conquering expedition, particularly in the area of his homeland, Extremaduran Trujillo. He returned to Panama with three of his brothers, many Extremaduran compatriots new to the Indies,6 a long string of offices and honors for himself, and nothing for his partner Almagro.


Pizarro went back to Spain 1528-Jan 1530, got crown approval to attack Peru, and recruited men. Particularly recruited in his homeland, Extramaduran Trujillo. Many of these men were new to the Indies.

	
	The 1531 Expedition

	In Pizarro’s absence, Almagro, the manager and organizer of the two, along with Bartolomé Ruiz and others, had made considerable progress toward financing and manning the expected conquest. Ruiz had been to Nicaragua to collect men, and he and Almagro had begun negotiations with important leaders there, to persuade them to contribute ships and bring their followings to Peru. When Almagro discovered how he had been slighted, the partnership temporarily collapsed, but promises overcame his resentment. Around January, 1531, an expedition of three ships, perhaps 180 men, and some thirty horses left Panama, with Pizarro in command.7


While Pizarro in Spain, Almagro and Ruiz got funding and recruited. Ruiz got men from Nicaragua. Almagro temporarily got pissed at Pizarro for screwing him then they all went to conquer Peru in 1531 with 180 men and 30 horses.

How many of the people they brought had seen the Inca before? You'd think it would be hard to convince someone you could conquer an entire empire with 180 men. 


	Coaque

	Within a short time the men were in the vicinity of the north Ecuadorian coast, but upon landing they found the first Indian towns deserted. They advanced to a large settlement called Coaque, which they attacked and occupied, taking a respectable profit in gold and silver pieces.8 This treasure Pizarro sent to Panama and Nicaragua in the ships, which were to bring back reinforcements. To await them, the expedition settled down in Coaque for several months; many of the men fell victim to a strange disease which caused walnut-sized growths on their faces and bodies. At last a ship came from Panama under entrepreneur Pedro Gregorio (in connection with Almagro), bringing supplies, the three royal treasury officials, possibly twenty-odd men, and about thirteen horses.9 Thereupon the main body advanced south by land.


landed, found towns deserted (why?), attacked large settlement Coaque and sent back gold to Panama and Nicaragua. The ships were to come back with reinforcements (guess this could be why recruiting worked, say they'd have reinforcements). They waited for months, contracted strange disease, Almagro-connected ship can back with 20 men and 13 horses and they set off for Inca by land.


	Benalcázar Arrives

	They had gone only as far as Puertoviejo when two ships appeared on the coast with news that a party of about thirty men and twelve horses, under Sebastián de Benalcázar, had arrived from Nicaragua and was proceeding toward them by land from the north.10 In a few days Benalcázar’s men joined the main group and were well received, though there was some grumbling at their small number. Apparently this was not the large party expected from Nicaragua.


near start of journey two ships from Nicaragua landed and caught-up with them. They brought 30 men and 12 horses and party complained not enough reinforcements (by now might have seen Incan empire legit)


	Puná and the Arrival of Soto

	As the expedition worked its way painfully down the coast, still suffering from diseases, it came near to the large island of Puná, in the gulf of Guayaquil. Seeking a place of recuperation and refuge from seasonal rains, the Spaniards crossed to the island, but they chose poorly, for the Indians of Puná gave them some of the hardest fighting of the whole campaign.11 The greatest event of the stay on Puná, however, was the expected arrival from Nicaragua and Panama of Hernando de Soto’s party: two ships, perhaps a hundred men, and twenty-five horses.12 With this reinforcement the expedition prepared in February, 1532, to return to the mainland and enter Inca territory.


detoured (by ship) to island of Puna where residents gave them "hardest fighting of the whole campaign." There met up with Hernando de Soto's ships with 100 men and 25 horses. Then Feb 1532 returned to mainland and Inca territory.


	The Foundation of San Miguel

	Túmbez had been the most impressive settlement that Pizarro and the Thirteen had seen in the 1528 reconnoitering; the intention now was to make it the capital of Peru, and several men on the expedition already had royal appointments to the council of the future city. But epidemics and a war with Puná had since ravaged the region, which seemed dry and without mineral wealth, in any case. For several months the expedition occupied the Túmbez region quite uneventfully,13 then after a time of exploration headed south to look for a better place to found a city.

	The Spaniards were now beginning to see Inca highways, herds of livestock, and warehouses. They met no more resistance than occasional skirmishing, flight, or rebellion after submission. The place they chose for a settlement was San Miguel (Piura) about a hundred miles south of Túmbez, thought to be well-watered, populous, and not far from a good port.14 Some forty Spaniards—the older, weaker, and infirm—became citizens and received encomiendas in the area.15 The rest, hearing of the Inca emperor’s presence at Cajamarca in the highlands, set out to encounter him.



Returned to Tumbez but found it ravaged by war with Puna (last there 4 years ago). Explored a bit and went south looking for better place to found a city. Started seeing highways, livestock, and warehouses. Met no more resistance than occasional skirmishes, flight, rebellion. Founded city at Piura called San Miguel. Some stayed and rest went after Atahuallpa after hearing he was at Cajamarca.

	
	The First Interview with Atahuallpa

	During their ascent the Spaniards were often mystified or made suspicious, but never attacked. In the afternoon of November 15, 1532, they made an unmolested entry into the deserted central square of Cajamarca;16 Emperor Atahuallpa and his thousands of followers were encamped some distance away at a spring. The governor sent out Hernando de Soto and some of the best horsemen, whose mission it was to invite the emperor to visit the Spaniards, with the intention of capturing him according to standard procedure. Soto was not long gone when Pizarro had misgivings about sending such a small group, and sent another of the same size under his brother Hernando. Exactly how many men went, and what was said, has been obscured by greatly varying reports, but to have ridden on the mission was a feather in a man’s cap. After making the Spaniards wait, Atahuallpa agreed to come to the Spanish camp the following day.


were mystified and suspicious on trek to Cajamarca but not attacked. Pizarro sent de Soto and some of his best horsemen to Atahuallpa to invite him into trap. Shortly after sent similar size group under Hernando. How many went and what was said is obscured by varying reports. being on mission "a feather in cap" (who was selected for this? Would be in unique position to gage disposition of Attahuallpa and his warriors). Attahuallpa agreed to come to camp next day.


	Cajamarca

	The morning of November 16 found the Spaniards prepared to assault Atahuallpa whenever he should appear before them. Most of the some sixty horsemen were distributed in three large buildings on as many sides of the square, under the captaincy of Soto, Benalcázar, and Hernando Pizarro. A few others supported Governor Pizarro and some twenty-five footmen in a building on the fourth side. Perhaps seventy footmen were posted in small detachments to guard the several entryways to the enclosed square. Pedro de Candía, with a few artillerymen and musketeers, was atop a fortress that lay either in or on the square. At the proper moment, Pizarro’s ensign was to hoist his standard, upon which the trumpets would sound, the artillery would fire, and the onslaught would begin.


	From earliest morning Atahuallpa had begun to move his thousands. Messengers went back and forth, saying first that Atahuallpa would come unarmed, then that he would bring weapons, while Pizarro replied that it made no difference—perhaps the truest word uttered that day on either side.17 It was late afternoon before the Inca’s forces, filling the fields, came to rest some hundreds of yards from the square. Again Atahuallpa needed persuasion to come farther, and Spaniard Hernando de Aldana visited his camp.

	At last the emperor advanced toward the square, his following now reduced to a few thousand. The Spaniards were impressed by the hundreds of nobles who accompanied him in checked livery, singing in unison while they swept away straws and pebbles in his path. The Indians were armed, but only with small maces and slings. Once the whole entourage was inside the square, the Dominican fray Vicente de Valverde came out with an interpreter to speak to Atahuallpa. The Spanish intention, standard in such cases, was to get the chieftain into their power peacefully if possible. Words passed between the two, but Atahuallpa soon became agitated, and Valverde returned, shouting.

	At this the signal was given and the attack began, though not quite as planned, since not all the guns went off, and, when the Spaniards rushed out, many of the inexperienced footmen around the governor became frightened and fell to one side.18 Nevertheless, Pizarro and those remaining pressed into the crowd of Indians toward the litter of Atahuallpa. Miguel Estete de Santo Domingo is said to have first laid hands on him, and Pizarro himself to have taken him prisoner. Meanwhile the horsemen were having the effect of an earthquake on the mass of Indians inside the plaza. Many were trampled, and others trampled each other, until by sheer force they knocked over one of the walls around the square and began to escape into the open fields. The Spaniards then went out into the fields to meet a great horde of fully armed warriors, whom they quickly routed and pursued until darkness fell, killing thousands and collecting gold and silver objects in unprecedented quantity. No Spaniard had lost his life.


Pizarro set up his ambush with Soto, Benalcazar, and Hernando as captains. MessengerswWent back and forth with Atahuallpa about things like whether or not to come armed, maybe Pizarro saying "it doesn't matter" being most honest thing said by both sides. Inca forces filled fields and stopped hundreds of yards from the square. Atahuallpa needed persuasion to come farther and Hernand de Aldana was sent to his camp. Finally Atahuallpa came to square with a few thousand men with impressive signing, checkered shirts and sweeping. They were armed with small maces and slings.

Friar Vicente came out to meet him, pissed him off and called for the attack. Signal was given but not as planned since not all guns went off and some inexperienced footmen fell over frightened. Nevertheless Pizarro and those remaining pressed into the crowd of Indians and took Atahuallpa. Meanwhile the horsemen trampled many people who knocked over a wall to escape. Pizarro's men went into the fields, met a horde of fully armed warriors and killed thousands of Incans. They looted a lot of gold and silver and none of Pizarro's men died.


	The Treasure

	Atahuallpa, now a prisoner, promised to fill a room with gold and silver in return for his life, and, as most say, for his liberty as well. The Spaniards agreed. As for Atahuallpa’s liberty, it is hard to see how they can have been serious, unless, as Juan Ruiz states, they intended to send him to his homeland of Quito,19 for the whole expedition was predicated on the assumption of permanent Spanish rule in Peru under Governor Pizarro. The conquerors now settled down at Cajamarca to await the assembly of the treasure and also the arrival of further reinforcements. The country appeared calm, but many of the emperor’s “captains” in other areas seemed disposed to assert their independence.


Atahuallpa promises to fill a room with gold for his live, and most say for his liberty too. Lockhart says it's hard to believe liberty proposition was serious unless story of Juan Ruiz that they intended to send him to his homeland is believed, since the whole point was subjugating Inca.

They camped at Cajamarca and waited for treasure and reinforcements. Country seemed calm except some things going on with emperor's "captains."


	Hernando Pizarro Goes to Pachacámac

	As the months stretched on, through the spring of 1533, the Spaniards grew impatient and insecure, and began to take a more active part in the treasure collection. In one of the most famous exploits of the whole campaign, Hernando Pizarro took a small body of horsemen and footmen far across the country to the great temple of Pachacámac, near the future site of Lima. Though the gold there proved far less than expected, the Spaniards cast down the idol, and on their way back intercepted a great fortune in the hands of an Inca captain at Jauja.20


Months stretched on, Pizarro's men grew patient and insecure, and went out for treasure themselves. Hernando took group across country to Pachacamac, found less gold than expected, defaced temple then intercepted Chalcuchimac and looted a fortune he had with him.


	Emissaries to Cuzco

	In the same period, three Spaniards were sent under safe conduct to Cuzco, the Inca capital, partly to take possession for Spain, but mainly to hasten the removal of treasure.21 More successful than Hernando Pizarro, they brought back hundreds of loads of gold, and their feat became legendary, though often attributed to the wrong men.22


Around the same time three of Pizarro's men were sent under safe conduct to Cuzco to claim for Spain but also looted back lots of gold. This became legendary but is often attributed to the wrong men (why?). 

	
	Distribution of the Treasure

	Over these months pressures continued to build up. The governor wished to get on with the conquest. The royal treasury officials arrived from San Miguel and were unhappy to see so much gold and silver accumulating, without their being able to dispatch the king’s fifth to Spain. In April, 1533,23 a body of some two hundred men arrived from Panama under Almagro, to learn that they would not receive a share of the growing hoard. They could not complain overmuch of this on principle, but became rapidly disaffected as it began to appear that the whole vast wealth of the country would go to the captors of Atahuallpa while they would not receive a penny. On top of all this, reports and rumors began to be heard about large-scale movements of Indian warriors through the countryside; whether true or not, they disturbed the conquerors considerably.

	Thus the interests of almost all the Spaniards were converging on the necessity of eliminating Atahuallpa and distributing the treasure quickly. Assaying and melting down of the metals began in mid-May, in anticipation of Atahuallpa’s execution. This then took place in the latter part of July, at about the same time as the distribution of the treasure.24

	The total gold and silver, spoils and ransom together, turned out to be worth over 1.5 million pesos,25 beyond anything seen or dreamed of in the Indies to that date. All but the king’s fifth went to the more than 160 men of Cajamarca, the subjects of the present study. Even lowly footmen now had fortunes exceeding what captains had been able to get in Mexico, Guatemala, or Nicaragua.

	Some twenty lucky men were permitted to return home with their wealth. The impact of their arrival in Spain was without parallel, particularly on the crown, which soon sent chief emissary Hernando Pizarro back to Peru for more of the same.


Pizarro wanted to get on with conquest. Almagro and 200 men arrived from Panama and they fought over the treasure. They heard reports and rumors of rebellion and decided to execute Atahuallpa. They started melting gold and doling it out. Twenty men (which?) were permitted to return home with their wealth, and the immpact of their arrival in Spain was without parallel, especially on crown who sent chief emissary Hernando back to Peru for more of the same.


	Jauja

	The rest of the Spaniards, both men of Cajamarca and new arrivals, continued the conquest, for so they considered it. Only later would the idea arise that the Inca empire had collapsed with one thunderbolt. The conquerors advanced in formation, expecting resistance and often meeting it, apparently most often from Quito compatriots of Atahuallpa, who were still in central Peru after the Incan civil wars. Leaving Cajamarca in August, 1533, the Spaniards reached Jauja in the central highlands in just two months.26 There was discussion of making the town their capital, and a Spanish municipality and council were formed, though only provisionally.


The men of Cajamarca and new arrivals continued their conquest, though Inca empire might have been already collapsed by then. They often met resistance from Quito compatriots of Atahuallpa, who were still in central Peru after the Incan civil wars. They reached Juaja and made a town there.


	Vilcaconga

	In late October the expedition departed for Cuzco, leaving the royal treasurer, Riquelme, with a substantial party, to hold Jauja and guard the treasure left there. Soto started out several days in advance of the main body with a mounted vanguard. About a week into November, well over halfway to the Inca capital, Soto and his men experienced the worst military disaster of the Peruvian conquest. Trying to get to Cuzco and its riches first, Soto’s party had gone too far ahead of the rest and, even worse, had tired out both men and horses. As they were ascending a long slope at Vilcaconga, Indians attacked them with a hail of stones and weapons from above. They barely managed to reach the top, with more casualties than the expedition had suffered in all the rest of the action since Túmbez. A relief party under Almagro extricated them.


They departed for Cuzco leaving some at Jauja. Soto went ahead and got ambushed, suffering more casualties than any of their defeats in whole campaign. Almagro came to help them.


	Cuzco

	The Spaniards entered Cuzco on November 15, 1533, and after some skirmishes with the Indians from Quito were well enough received by the rest of the population. During the months that the conquerors quartered in the Inca palaces and other buildings in the center of the city, another great treasure was collected, this time with more silver than gold, and distribution to the men duly took place in early March, 1534. On March 23, 1534, the governor founded a Spanish municipality in Cuzco. Some eighty conquerors enrolled as citizens and received encomiendas in the district, but only forty stayed to guard the town, while all the others returned in the direction of Jauja.27 The expedition as a band of men was dispersing, and the conquest proper was over.


Entered Cuzco November 1533, and after skirmishes with Quito were well enough received by the rest of the population. Looted silver and founded a Spanish municipality in Cuzco. Eighty conqueors enrolled and received encomiendas, but only 40 stayed to guard Cuzco while the rest went to Juaja. The expedition as a band of men was dispersing, and the conquest proper was over.


	The Exodus

	Returning to Jauja with most of the conquerors in April, 1534, the governor reestablished the town, and in July and August proceeded to assign encomiendas to its citizens.28 At the same time he issued a general license for Spaniards to leave Peru, and about sixty conquerors, most of them men from Cajamarca, departed immediately for Spain. Since Jauja was soon found to be too inaccessible, the governor with general agreement evacuated the town, incorporating it into the new capital, Lima, founded on the coast in January, 1535. A little later he established Trujillo, named for his home town, near the coast to the north.


Returned to Jauja April 1534 and assigned ecomiendas. Pizarro issued a general license for them to leave, and sixty conquerors, most of them men of Cajamarca, departed immediately for Spain. Pizarro and the rest founded Lima and Trujillo.

	
	Offshoots: Quito and Chile

	After the distribution of treasure at Cajamarca in 1533, Sebastián de Benalcázar went back to preside over the town of San Miguel. There he began independently organizing an expedition to carry out the conquest of the Quito area, which he and his men accomplished in the course of 1534. But Pedro de Alvarado invaded Quito with a large band of Spaniards from Guatemala; at the same time Almagro arrived in the area after the conquest of Cuzco and achieved a settlement in favor of Governor Pizarro. A few men of Cajamarca were in Quito accompanying Benalcázar and Almagro, but none stayed except Benalcázar himself.

	Almagro now had the title of Marshal, and he was shortly to become governor and adelantado of an undefined area to the south of Pizarro’s, named New Toledo (the kingdom of Toledo being his home region). Returning to central Peru, he took Alvarado’s men and other newcomers with him to Cuzco, and in 1535 left with a large expedition on his disastrous exploration of Chile. A small number of the men of Cajamarca went with him.


Meanwhile, after distribution of treasure at Cajamarca in 1533, Benalcazar went to preside over San Miguel and organized conquest of the Quito area, which he finished by 1534. Pedro de Alvardo also invaded Quito with a large band from Guatamala while Almagro arrived after conquest of Cuzco and achieved a settlement (for loot?) in favor of Pizarro. A few men of Cajamarca were with Benalcazar and Almagro, but none stayed except Benalcazar.

Almagro decided to become governor of area south of Pizarro's, gathered Alvadro's men and other newcomers to Cuzco, and left on a disastrous exploration of Chile in 1535. A small number of the men of Cajamarca went with him.


	The Great Rebellion and Siege of Cuzco

	If a people’s first resistance to an invasion is unsuccessful, it is invariably soon followed by a second resistance or rebellion. This phenomenon occurred in Peru in 1536–1537. Under their traditional leadership, the Indians rose in all parts of the country. Lima was briefly besieged, while the less than two hundred Spaniards in Cuzco were cut off from the coast for over a year. These conflicts cost the lives of several of the first conquerors, who were now encomenderos of the large towns.


Under old leadership, the Incans rebelled in 1536-37 in all parts of the country. They briefly besiged Lima and besieged the 200 Spaniard at Cuzco for about a year. This cost the lives of several of the first conquerors.

	
	The Almagrist Wars

	Almagro and his men returned to Cuzco in the spring of 1537, having found no evidence of significant amounts of precious metals in upper Peru or Chile. The great silver mines of Charcas were still unsuspected. Putting an end to the Indian siege, Almagro seized Cuzco as his own, and before long laid claim to the whole southern half of Peru. In reply, the Pizarros organized an army and marched into the highlands. At Salinas, near Cuzco, they defeated Almagro badly and had him executed shortly afterward. Men of Cajamarca participated in the fighting, mainly on the side of the Pizarros.

	After this the Spaniards founded subsidiary towns, such as La Plata (Charcas), Arequipa, Huamanga, and Huánuco. A second, more modest and successful Chile expedition went out under Pedro de Valdivia, in company with Pedro Sancho de Hoz, a first conqueror, in 1539–1540.

	In 1541 partisans of don Diego, Almagro’s mestizo son, assassinated Francisco Pizarro and put don Diego in power. A new royal governor, Vaca de Castro, soon entered the country, and at the head of most of the encomenderos of Peru defeated the younger Almagro in 1542 at Chupas, once again near Cuzco. This time only three or four first conquerors were with the Almagrists.



Almagro returned from Chile without gold and ended the seige. He took Cuzco for his own and claimed the southern half of Peru. The Pizarros organized an army, defeated Almagro badly and had him executed. Men of Cajamarca were at that battle, mostly on the Pizarro's side.

The Spaniard founded some more towns, and Valdivia led a successful Chile expedition with Pedro Sancho de Hoz in 1539-1540.

Almagro had an Incan wife, and their son assassinated Pizarro in 1541 and put don Diego in power. A new royal governor Vaca de Castro came and with most of the encomenderos of Peru defeated younger Almagro in 1542. Three or four men of Cajamarca were with the Almagrists.

	
	The Gonzalo Pizarro Rebellion

	Vaca de Castro cheated Pizarro’s youngest brother, Gonzalo, of the governorship of Peru, which Francisco had bequeathed to him by a previous royal concession. Had Gonzalo not been leading an expedition into the Amazon region at the time of his assassination, he might have challenged Vaca de Castro openly. As it was, he was left discontented, with powerful allies.

	In 1544 Viceroy Blasco Núñez Vela arrived in Peru with royal directives which would have cut deeply into the significance of the encomienda, the basis of Spanish occupation. With wide support Gonzalo raised an army in Cuzco, marched to Lima, and forced the audiencia to receive him as governor. He then ruled Peru for four years in the face of all challenges, winning several battles. A majority of the surviving first conquerors supported him at least for a time; some were prominent leaders in his cause. A few suffered his wrath for disloyalty.


Vaca de Castro cheated Pizarro's heir and brother Gonzalo out of governorship of Peru. Gonzalo was exploring the Amazon at the time so was left discontented, but with powerful allies. In 1544 viceroy Vela arrived with orders to reform ecomienda. Gonzalo raised an army and forced the royals to accept him as governor. He had wide support including a majority of the surviving men of Cajamarca, some of whom were prominent leaders for his cause. A few men of Cajamarca suffered his wrath for disloyalty (which and which?).


	When royal emissary Licenciado Gasca entered the country in 1547 with pardons for all and repeal of the offending measures, most of the conquerors and other encomenderos went over to his side. The battle of Jaquijahuana (for the third time near Cuzco) was an easy royal victory. Gonzalo Pizarro’s execution terminated the last major external event in the lives of the first conquerors.


royal Gasca came in 1547 with pardons all around and a repeal of the reforms. Most of the conquerors and other encomenderos sided with him. The battle was an easy victory for Gasca, and Pizarro's execution terminated the last major external event in the lives of the men of Cajamarca.




other soldiers:

Pedro Cataño (mentioned in this book, involved in debate to kill Adabalipa: http://www.historyisaweapon.com/defcon7/%5BHemming_John%5D_The_Conquest_of_the_Incas(BookZZ.org).pdf
)


https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=es&u=http://www.revistas.uma.es/index.php/baetica/article/download/67/35&prev=search
	...These were the first Spaniards that Ata-
hualpa, a fact that was reviewed by the chroniclers as Oviedo, who compiled
in his work the names of all the riders, among which Ginés was included
of Carranza, information that the chronicler obtained from one of those present, the
conquistador Diego de Molina, whom he met in the city of Santo Domingo
of the Spanish island


Ginés de Carranza another

Oviedo interviewed soldiers under Pizarro




------


What happened in Nicaragua?



https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Spanish_conquest_of_Nicaragua
	Nicaragua before the conquest

	When the Spanish first arrived in what is now Nicaragua there were three principal indigenous groups living in the western portions of the country; these were the Chorotega (also known as the Mangue),[6] the Nicarao, and the Matagalpa (also known as Chontal, from the Nahuatl term for "foreigner").[7] 

	...The population of Nicaragua at the time of contact is estimated at approximately 825,000. The first century after Spanish contact witnessed the demographic collapse of the native populations, resulting principally from exposure to Old World diseases and their exportation as slaves, but also from a combination of war and mistreatment.[14]


https://www.britannica.com/topic/Chorotega
	Chorotega, the most powerful American Indian tribe of northwest Costa Rica at the time of the Spanish conquest. They spoke Mangue, a language of Oto-Manguean stock, and had probably migrated from a homeland in Chiapas many generations prior to the conquest, driving the aboriginal inhabitants out of their new territory.

	The Chorotega were corn farmers, had markets and a semidemocratic social structure in which chiefs were elected, and carried on frequent warfare with neighbouring peoples. They wore padded cotton armour and fought with bow and arrow and a wooden sword set with small flint knives. Religious festivals featured the South American custom of the ritual drinking bout; however, Mexican traits such as human sacrifice and self-mutilation of the ears, tongue, and genitals were also present. A pantheon of gods was worshiped in specially constructed temples. Chorotegan culture and language disappeared during the colonial period. 



http://www.vozdeguanacaste.com/i/archives/07_11/07_11_regional_07.html
	Arrival of Spanish conquerors changed the balance of this ethnic group. According to one theory, the Spanish took most of the Chorotega men down to Peru to use them as workers, leaving very few women and children behind. The motivation behind this act also remains a question. This was when the assimilation started that lead to the loss of their language and culture. According to Guerrero, as the families were separated it was harder for the remaining women and children to stay together and resist the assimilation.


Chorotega were powerful in Costa Rica at time of conquest

They elected officials, made frequent war with neighbors and practiced human sacrifice which is similar to peoples from Mexico then

it is said that most of the Chorotega were taken to Peru as slaves when the spanish arrived, taking men but leaving women and children behind. 


hard to find anything on what happened to them in Nicaragua

seems like Conquistadors didn't take good notes (I wonder why)



https://www.encyclopedia.com/humanities/encyclopedias-almanacs-transcripts-and-maps/nicarao
	The Nicarao are an ethnic group of Mexican Nahuatl origin. The Nicarao settled in Classic and Postclassic times around Lake Managua and Lake Nicaragua, where they established a number of towns, some of which later became the foundations for the Spanish cities of León, Managua, Granada, and Chinandega. They developed commerce and other relations with native peoples already in the region. These activities led to a war with the Chorotegans that ended about ce 1200 with the establishment of the Nicarao around Lake Nicaragua and especially on Ometepe Island. Gil González Dávila, who encountered these people on his 1523 expedition to Nicaragua, referred to their chief as Nicarao. On his peaceful visit he claimed to have baptized more than thirty-two thousand. There is controversy over the population of the Nicarao at the time of the Conquest, but it appears to have been in the range of one hundred thousand to two hundred thousand among a total Indian population of Pacific Nicaragua of about a half million. Slave exports to other colonies and disease quickly decimated their numbers, although enough survived to become a part of the ethnic foundation of modern Nicaragua.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nicarao_(cacique)
	Christopher Columbus, on his 4th and last voyage in 1502, explored the eastern coast of what is now known as Nicaragua but did not venture to its western coast, nor did he come into contact with any indigenous people. In 1522, the Spanish conquistador Gil González Dávila left Panama with 100 men, beginning the first incursion into the western regions of Costa Rica and Nicaragua. When they arrived in southwestern Nicaragua, they encountered a Nahuat-speaking tribe, and with the help of two indigenous interpreters who had come with González Dávila, he was able to have a discourse with the tribe's cacique, who has since been commonly referred to by the name Nicarao.[1]



The Nicaro arrived around 1200, got to know and trade with some of the people there, and went to war with the Chorotegans.

Gonzales Davila met them on his 1523 expedition and called their cheif Nicarao.

They were about 30% of population of Nicaragua when the Spanish arrived but were quickly decimated.



https://books.google.com/books?id=FiYQxd-_07gC&pg=PA15&lpg=PA15s
	PRE-COLONIAL NICARAGUA AND ITS INDIGENOUS POPULATION

	The so-called Ancient Footprints of Acahualinca found near the crater lake of Acahualinca in Managua provide evidence of humans inhabiting Nicaragua at least 6,000 years ago. The tracks consist of well-preserved human footprints in petrified volcanic ash and mud. Little is known about the original inhabitants. Peoples in western Nicaragua migrated southward from Mexico and arrived several centuries prior to the Spanish. They spoke the Pipil language which is closely related to the Nahuatl language spoke by the Aztecs. Similar to the early inhabitants of Mexico, they drank chocolate, raised turkeys and dogs for their meat, and their staple foods were corn, beans, squash, chili peppers, and avocados. There is some dispute as to the origins of the early inhabitants of the Caribbean lowlands. Some argue that they migrated from South America although other evidence indicates that they migrated from Mexico. These semi-nomadic groups lacked permanent settlements and engaged largely in hunting and fishing. They cultivated limited amounts of arrowroot, manioc, and dates. Later these groups in the Caribean lowlands engaged in slash-and-burn agriculture.


Someone inhabited Nicaragua long ago. "Several centuries" before the Spanish arrived, some (new people?) migrated there from Mexico and maybe South America too (another debate). When these people arrived they were nomads, but later built towns and agriculture.

	
	...There were three principal groups of indigenous peoples living in the western part of the country when the Spanish arrived: The Chorotegano or Chorotegas (sometimes referred to as Mangues), the Niquirano or Nicaraos, and the Chontal. The Chorotegas arrived in Nicaragua between the fourth and ninth centuries from Mexico. The cities of the Chorotegas had central plazas with market places and religious centers. They had an organized military and sacrificed slaves for religious purposes. Entire family clans lived in long houses consistent of wood with thatched roofs. They left large basalt figures on the islands of Zapatera and Ometepe in Lake Nicaragua. The cities of Diria and Biriamba both claim to be the home of the legendary Chorotega warrior cheif Diriangen who was immortalized in Carlos Mejia Godoy's famous revolutionary love song Nicaragua, Nicaraguita.


Chorotegas arrived between 300-900 AD, built some cities, sacrificed slaves for religious purposes, famous legendary person from them is warrior chief Diriangen


	The Nicaros arrived around the thirteenth century. They were successful in agriculture and developed trade ties with other indigenous peoples in Mexico and Peru. The most famous of the Nicaros, chief Nicaro for whom the country is named, lived in the city of Nicaraocali, now called Rivas. It is not known when the Chontal arrived in Nicaragua.


Nicaro arrived around 1200's, good at agrigulture and did trading, chief Nicaro famous

"not known" when Chontal arrived



hard to find anything about Chontal


http://www.everyculture.com/multi/Le-Pa/Nicaraguan-Americans.html
	Many thousands of years after the first people arrived in North America between 5000 and 2000 B.C. , the Mayan empire first began to develop along the Caribbean coast, and eventually its influence spread through a network of city-states that stretched from present-day southern Mexico into Honduras, just north of Nicaragua. The ancient Maya produced many intellectual and artistic accomplishments. They invented the first system of writing in the New World, developed a sophisticated knowledge of astronomy and mathematics, worshipped at brightly painted temples of stone, lived in large city-like centers, and sustained a rigid and highly structured society. The many Mayan temples and stone-paved roads that remain are testimony to the beauty, ingenuity, and durability of ancient Mayan architecture and engineering. But the Mayan culture that flowered so brilliantly was the same culture that waged the brutal civil wars that may have contributed to the sudden and mysterious downfall of the Mayan empire around 900 A.D. The descendants of the ancient Maya live today in Guatemala and the Yucatán Peninsula in southern Mexico. The influence of the ancient Maya is ubiquitous throughout Central America, and many Mayan-language words are present in the everyday Spanish spoken in modern Nicaragua.

	After the fall of the Maya, the Aztecs, a Nahuat-speaking group who originated in northern Mexico, came into full power. They eventually established a series of allegiances that spread from Mexico to El Salvador. The Nicarao and some of the other indigenous groups of Nicaragua may have originally fled south to Nicaragua in order to avoid subjugation by the aggressive Aztecs. These migrating groups of people brought with them the Aztec language and culture, both of which persist in various forms today in Nicaragua.


http://www.vivacostarica.com/costa-rica-information/history-of-costa-rica-1.html
	The largest and most advanced of Costa Rica's indigenous people, the Chorotegas (which translates to "fleeing people") migrated around A.D. 500 from Southern Mexico into the Nicoya Peninsula to escape slavery. Their customs, language and calendar were largely influenced by more advanced cultures of Mexico and Guatemala. The influence of the Mayans was evident in their written language and use of a calendar, while their spoken language, Nahua, is distinctly Aztec in origin. 


http://countrystudies.us/nicaragua/4.htm
	Two basic culture groups existed in precolonial Nicaragua. In the central highlands and Pacific coast regions, the native peoples were linguistically and culturally similar to the Aztec and the Maya. The oral history of the people of western Nicaragua indicates that they had migrated south from Mexico several centuries before the arrival of the Spanish, a theory supported by linguistic research. Most people of central and western Nicaragua spoke dialects of Pipil, a language closely related to Nahuatl, the language of the Aztec. The culture and food of the peoples of western Nicaragua also confirmed a link with the early inhabitants of Mexico; the staple foods of both populations were corn, beans, chili peppers, and avocados, still the most common foods in Nicaragua today. Chocolate was drunk at ceremonial occasions, and turkeys and dogs were raised for their meat.

	Most of Nicaragua's Caribbean lowlands area was inhabited by tribes that migrated north from what is now Colombia. The various dialects and languages in this area are related to Chibcha, spoken by groups in northern Colombia. 


I guess the Chorotega were Maya refugees, and the Nicarao were Aztec refugees.

	
	...The Chontal were culturally less advanced than the Niquirano and Chorotegano, who lived in well-established nation-states. The differences in the origin and level of civilization of these groups led to frequent violent encounters


https://books.google.com/books?id=vZuqHaXhr1cC&pg=PA492&lpg=PA492
	The term Bravo itself is the exact spanish equivalent of the Aztec Chontal, Chondal, that is, "barbarian," which at the time of the discovery was applied by the Cholutees to all the tribes dewlling east of the great lakes and on the Cordillera do los Andes as far north as Honduras and San Salvador. Here they seem to have supplanted a still more ancient race, who had attained a high state of civillization, as attested by the already-mentioned monuments and stone sculptures of Chontales, which are of a different type both from the Aztec and the Maya-Quiche remains of Yucatan and Guatamala.


Maybe they were from these guys:



https://www.researchgate.net/publication/309172243_El_Cascal_de_Flor_de_Pino_una_civilizacion_desconocida_en_la_costa_atlantica_de_NIcaragua
	The Cascal de Flor de Pino: a civilization unknown on the Atlantic coast of Nicaragua

	The Atlantic Coast of Nicaragua is still today a remote and unknown region. Although Christopher Columbus visited it in 1502, a large part of the Central-American isthmus was left out of the conquest by the Crown of Castile during the sixteenth century. From then until the end of the 19th century, the lagoons, rivers and forests of the Atlantic plain of Nicaragua have been little populated by European settlers. Among pirates and adventurers, England attempted to undermine Spanish hegemony in Central America. The ethnographic and historical sources, emerged in this context of conflict and slight European presence, drew a vision of the region where "the wild" was the most obvious characteristic for each and every one of the elements of that world: from the same nature to the indigenous peoples that inhabited it. Beginning in the 18th century, the Miskito, allies of the British Empire, expanded militarily through the region subduing indigenous groups and providing individuals, defeated and subdued, to the world slave market. From this framework, ethnographic sources, and subsequent historical interpretations, will speak of a region slightly inhabited by small indigenous groups, little developed technologically, without changes in their way of life, focused on hunting and gathering, and with confusing references to the possible existence of a farmer. The existence of centralized socio-political entities will not be proposed, in contrast to the evidence and monumentality of the Mesoamerican stratified societies (Oimecas, Mayas, Teotihuacán, ...) and South American (such as the "señoríos" Chibcha, etc.). Despite some questions of this vision in the first half of the 20th century (Steward, 1948), this has been the historical vision of the Atlantic Coast to this day. In the decade of the 70s, R. Magnus (1974) carried out a series of archaeological works in several concheros of the Atlantic Coast. In addition to a first ceramic sequence, these investigations provided the only four Carbon 14 allocations for the entire area. In this context of knowledge our research has been developed in the Atlantic Coast of Nicaragua, through two research projects that have included both prospections and archaeological excavations.



http://context.reverso.net/translation/spanish-english/concheros
	Nearby, the inhabitants of small villages dumped the remains of shells, fish, mammals and pottery for centuries, and these came to form platforms, known as "shell mounds".

	...Here, the old residents of the area left a testimony of their existence on "concheros", an incredible archeological storehouse.


https://books.google.com/books?id=QC4mDgAAQBAJ&pg=PA44&lpg=PA44


http://www.academia.edu/4854165/Prehistoric_settlement_of_the_Atlantic_Coast_of_Nicaragua._Absolute_chronology_of_Pearl_lagoon_and_Bluefields_Shellmiddens
	2006

	PREHISTORIC SETTLEMENT OF THE ATLANTIC COAST OF NICARAGU AABSOLUTE CHRONOLOGY OF PEARL LAGOON & BLUEFIELDS SHELLMIDDENS

	... In Belize, the Orange Walk and Belize phases, and the Palo Huecophase of Santa Luisa in Veracruz, give us a similar chronology to the Angi one. Several authors (Keegan1994; Veloz1991) think that the first settlers of Cuba and other islands of the Great Antilles could be the same as the ones from Atlantic Coast of Nicaragua. The early exploitation of coastal environment is also evident in the pacific coast of the isthmus, where sites like Cerro Mangote in Panama or several shell middens of the coast of Chiapas and Guerrero bring up dates earlier than 5,500 BP. The radiocarbon allowance to the Early Holocene of several Caribbean shell middens, like Banwari Tracé in the Dominican Republic, Remigio and other from the north-east of Venezuela and, more recently, Puerto Hormiga in Colombia; show the geographical extension of this phenomenon.

	...The available dates for the two shellmiddens of the Brown Bank group, two for Punta Masaya and three for Sitetaia refer to synchronics occuptations in what seems to be "villages" with several habitation units. This fact diverges from the pattern of highly dispersed houses along the coastline that is inferred from European sources of the 17th and 18th centuries.

	


https://www.researchgate.net/publication/309172243_El_Cascal_de_Flor_de_Pino_una_civilizacion_desconocida_en_la_costa_atlantica_de_NIcaragua
	...The recognition of the current and ancient coastline between Perlas Lagoon and Bluefields Bay, has allowed us to identify 20 archaeological sites formed by more than 80 concheros. The 17 absolute datacioles realized have allowed us to locate eight of these deposits between 1400/1200 a. of C. and 700/900 d. of C., as well as defining in more detail a provisional ceramic sequence for the entire area.

	A first review of the current record of archaeological sites shows certain imbalances with historical and ethnographic data. Several of the deposits are formed with different concheros associated to domestic units and that, when dating by radiocarbon, have provided synchronous results. Thus, the old settlements of Brown Bank, Karoline, Cukra Point and Sitetaia contradict the information about a dispersed settlement around isolated "ranches".


	...BY WAY OF CONCLUSION These five years of archaeological work in the area have substantially transformed the knowledge about the prehistoric communities that inhabited this stretch of the Caribbean coast. The previous notion of a pre-Columbian settlement reduced by small communities of hunters and gatherers has been overtaken by recent archaeological data. At present, our knowledge of the prehistory of the lowlands of the Caribbean of Nicoragua shows a much more complex and dynamic situation. The appearance of an urban center, with monumental architecture, allows us to propose the existence of centralized sociopolitical entities for the region and the period. From this center would depend several contemporary settlements, such as Karoline, among others.

	The chronological coincidence of deposits suggests the presence of a company structured around different deposits with specific characteristics and functionalities. This hypothesis is reinforced by the presence of the same ceramic designs in both El Cascal de Flor de Pino and Karoline, as well as in the morphologies of production for the lithic (both carved and polished). While Karoline is shown as a housing and production site, the Cascal de Flor de Pino is easily identifiable as a settlement where political power is concentrated and the contribution of productions is centralized and controlled; where the volume of the used hand is manifested in its magnitude.


(continuing pattern that inhabitants of Nicaragua were descendants of refugees from major civilizations)




http://articles.latimes.com/2003/jun/01/science/sci-cascal1
	Nicolas Jarquin was cutting trees in preparation for constructing a warehouse on the property of a Nicaraguan agricultural company when he noticed several large mounds exposed by the activity, some with building foundations on their surface.

	Before disturbing the site, he called in Spanish and Nicaraguan archeologists working at the nearby prehistoric village of Karoline to have a look.

	What they found surprised everyone involved: evidence of a poorly known, complex civilization that existed in the tropical forest just before the Maya began to dominate regions to the north.

	The location of the settlement, which the scientists have named El Cascal de Flor de Pino, was particularly surprising because most cultures in the region developed in the flatlands and valleys, said archeologist Ermengol Gassiot of the Autonomous University of Barcelona.

	"Usually, scientists say that the conditions in tropical forests are not suitable for the development of social and political complexity," he said. "But here we have a tropical forest [society] with great social complexity, and well before the Maya."

	Perhaps even more important, the discovery sheds new light on a region that has been an archeological terra incognita. The more glamorous civilizations of Mexico and northern Mesoamerica -- the Aztecs, the Maya, the inhabitants of Teotihuacan -- have overshadowed the cultures in the southern part of the region. It is only within the last decade or so that researchers have made a serious attempt to learn more about these mysterious peoples.

	The discovery, near the modern hamlet of Kukra Hill on the Caribbean coast about 200 miles east of Managua, suggests that complex societies were developing in Mesoamerica earlier than researchers had believed, Gassiot said. Experts hope that study of the site -- and particularly its violent demise around AD 400 -- will yield new insights into the evolution of the better-known kingdoms to the north of the area, including the Maya, and the more democratic societies to the south.

	The discovery may also help explain why the later Classic Maya civilization rarely used gold, even though it was widely available farther south.

	Gassiot does not know who built the city or what eventually became of its inhabitants. The first signs of habitation in the area date to about 1500 BC, and it appears that major construction began about 750 BC."







https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nicarao_(cacique)
	...In 2002, through the research done by two separate Nicaraguan historians working independently of each other, it was argued that the true name of the cacique was actually Macuilmiquiztli, which meant "Five Deaths" in the Nahuatl language.[1][4][6][7]

	It is not known how the name Nicarao came to be associated with the cacique Macuilmiquiztli. It's possible that the Spanish conquistadors may have derived the name Nicarao based on the ethnicity of his tribe, which was composed of Pipil-Nicarao people, who were a branch of Nahuas. Andrés de Cereceda, the treasurer of González Dávila's expedition,[4] wrote in his log the names of the caciques of the villages where gold was collected. In the vicinity of Costa Rica's Gulf of Nicoya, they found the largest indigenous village they had visited, which was ruled by a cacique named Chorotega. Since then, linguistic sources have used the name of that cacique as an eponym, "Chorotega people ", to encompass a number of villages which had cultural and linguistic similarities despite being physically separated.



























    ...The best estimate of the number of indigenous peoples living in Nicaragua at the time of the conquest is about 825,000. By 1581 there were only 50,000 to 60,000 remaining. Although mistreatment and cruelty by the Spaniards and death from fighting contributed to this dramatic depopulation, the primary reasons were slavery and exposure to "European" diseases such as measles and influenza.

    Nicaragua's primary economic activity from 1527 to 1542 was the export of indigenous peoples as slaves to Panama and Peru. ...allowed the power-seeking Spanish conquistadors to enslave hundreds of thousands of indigenous peoples via the encomienda system ...The inhabitants provided labor for the conquistador in return for religious instruction and safety. ...It is estimated that 5000,000 indigenous peoples were exported from the country as slaves from 1527 to 1542.  andWhen the slave trade ended in 1550, "there was simply no Indians left" to export. The Dominican Friar Bartolome de las Casas and Bishop of Leon Antonion de Valdivieso spoke out against the mistreatment, cruelty, and slavery to which the Spanish subjected the indigenous peoples.



https://books.google.com/books?id=DkgGVTOr2EsC&pg=PA40&lpg=PA40



https://catalog.hathitrust.org/Record/000337000
	Histoire du Nicaragua, par Gonzalo Fernandez de Oviedo y Valdés

	...A translation of chapters 1-13 of book 42 of Oviedo's "Historia general de las Indias," of which the first 19 books were published at Seville in 1535, and the complete work in 50 books, at Madrid, 1851-1855.



https://books.google.com/books?id=gm-tuJNH9sMC&printsec=frontcover&dq=Ferna%CC%81ndez+de+Oviedo%27s+chronicle+of+America+:+a+new+history+for+a+New+World&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjFy5r8t-baAhVBmuAKHexBBNUQ6AEIKTAA#v=onepage&q=Gonz%C3%A1lez%20D%C3%A1vila&f=false


Oviedo wrote a history of Nicaragua. He wrote of the journey of Gonzales Divila, who of the Spaniards first made contact with the Nicaraguans, and later fought de Soto and de Cordoba there.


https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=es&u=https://revistas.ucr.ac.cr/index.php/anuario/article/download/3328/12158&prev=search
	As the previous ones are the news that reco * Oviedo in his Nicaraguan stay. This, as it looks, it turned out to be very interesting and, apart from those accumulated in the Fourth Book of the Third Part of his History, I cover other scattered throughout the whole chronicle. New slats for we are the one who refers to the discovery of Nicaragua undertaken by Gil Gonzalez Davila and that, besides being quite unknown, contributes a fact excluded by Gonzalez Davila in his car of 1524. Said conqueror sent precisely one letter to Oviedo, in which he tells in more completes his expedition, achieving the cronista apro vecarla to the maximum and rescue what could 11a marse the first "go-home" of the history of Hispa noamerica And it was the following: in the wake of his defeat by the daughters of Gonzalez Davila, the Nicaraguans they said to the invader: teba, teba, xuja, toya, toya, (It's okay, walk, fast, quickly) while the Spanish captain was forced to evict the territory6.
	

Oviedo published a huge work and it kept getting republished under different names

this looks like at least part of it in English: https://archive.org/details/pleasanthistorie00lpez

other translations of him:

http://www.texascounties.net/articles/discovery-of-texas/narvaez-westtexas.htm
	"The Joint Report Recorded by Gonzalo Fernandez de Oviedo y Valdes," translated to English by Gerald Theisen, published in The Narrative of Alvar Nunez Cabeza de Vaca by The Imprint Society, 1972


https://books.google.com/books?id=7RGlz9a4wVYC&pg=PA470&lpg=PA470
	Gonzalo Fernandez de Oviedo, Sumario de la natural y general istoria de las Indias (Toledo, 1526), translation in NAW 1:273-74


http://www.worldcat.org/title/journey-of-the-vaca-party-the-account-of-the-narvaez-expedition-1528-1536-as-related-by-gonzalo-fernandez-de-oviedo-y-valdes/oclc/1339029
	The journey of the Vaca party : the account of the Narváez expedition, 1528-1536, as related by Gonzalo Fernández de Oviedo y Valdés
	Author: 	Gonzalo Fernández de Oviedo y Valdés; Basil Calvin Hedrick; Carroll L Riley


http://www.worldcat.org/title/verdadera-relacion-de-la-conquista-del-peru-y-provincia-del-cuzco-etc-with-42-five-line-stanzas-relating-to-the-author-at-the-end-by-g-fernandez-de-oviedo-y-valdes/oclc/504048304&referer=brief_results
	[Verdadera relacion de la conquista del Peru y provincia del Cuzco, etc. With 42 five-line stanzas relating to the author, at the end, by G. Fernandez de Oviedo y Valdes?].
	Author: 	Francisco de XERES; Gonzalo FERNANDEZ DE OVIEDO Y VALDÉS; Francisco PIZARRO, Marquis.
	Publisher: 	[Seville], [1534]

does author bio suggest it's Oviedo?


http://www.worldcat.org/title/historia-general-y-natural-de-las-indias-islas-y-tierra-firme-del-mar-oceano/oclc/880501466&referer=brief_results
	Historia general y natural de las Indias, islas y tierra-firme del mar oceano
	Author: 	Gonzalo Fernández de Oviedo y Valdés
	Publisher: 	[Place of publication not identified] : [publisher not identified]
	Edition/Format: 	 eBook : Document : English


https://www.amazon.com/Fern%C3%A1ndez-Oviedos-Chronicle-America-History/dp/0292726120


http://www.worldcat.org/title/natural-history-of-the-west-indies/oclc/1609075&referer=brief_results
	Natural history of the West Indies.
	Author: 	Gonzalo Fernández de Oviedo y Valdés
	Publisher: 	Chapel Hill, University of North Carolina Press [1959]


http://www.worldcat.org/title/de-la-natural-hystoria-de-la-indias-a-facs-ed-iss-in-honor-of-sterling-a-stoudemire/oclc/631757675&referer=brief_results
	De la natural hystoria de la Indias : a facs. ed. iss. in honor of Sterling A. Stoudemire.
	Author: 	Gonzalo Fernández de Oviedo y Valdés; Sterling A Stoudemire
	Publisher: 	Chapel Hill, NC : Univ. of North Carolina Press, 1969.


http://www.worldcat.org/title/translations-of-passages-from-fernandez-de-oviedos-historia-general-y-natural-de-las-indias/oclc/661950305&referer=brief_results
	Translations of passages from Fernández de Oviedo's "Historia general y natural de las Indias."
Author: 	Gonzalo Fernández de Oviedo y Valdés


http://www.worldcat.org/title/historia-general-y-natural-de-las-indias-part-iii-book-iv-chapters-i-ii-iii-v-xi-xii-xiii/oclc/79783535&referer=brief_results
	Historia general y natural de las Indias : part III, book IV, chapters I, II, III, V, XI, XII, XIII
	Author: 	Gonzalo Fernández de Oviedo y Valdés

	...translated by Alice Gillespie.



https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pedro_de_Alvarado#Peru


https://books.google.com/books?id=DkgGVTOr2EsC&pg=PA40&lpg=PA40



------





https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Battle_of_Isandlwana


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Quizquiz



https://books.google.com/books?id=HP8XBQAAQBAJ&pg=PA182&lpg=PA182&dq=Pizarro%27s+Relaci%C3%B3n&source=bl&ots=gGzNWHfgBc&sig=hkS_4k_3VgT7M7Lftb1JctwegAw&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjPsejR0uHaAhVPj1kKHc3GDK0Q6AEIiAEwCw#v=onepage&q=Pizarro's%20Relaci%C3%B3n&f=false

https://archive.org/stream/relationofdiscov00pizauoft/relationofdiscov00pizauoft_djvu.txt
	for I have heard that many of the Spaniards 



180 Pedro Pizarro 

made water without knowing it out of sheer 
terror. 




https://books.google.com/books?id=xJ__Arpje0UC&pg=PA61&lpg=PA61&dq=Francisco+Pizarro%27s+interpreter&source=bl&ots=wMNeUH3PTn&sig=YsxZOHqpKA6fs57YW10KV_F3hyM&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwjPl7vS4-HaAhWiiOAKHVutCJgQ6AEImQEwDg#v=onepage&q=Francisco%20Pizarro's%20interpreter&f=false

interpreters

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Felipillo

http://thebiography.us/en/felipillo

https://books.google.com/books?id=tV9IAAAAYAAJ&pg=PA428&lpg=PA428



------


https://archive.org/stream/relationofdiscov00pizauoft/relationofdiscov00pizauoft_djvu.txt
	Then the Spaniards spent the whole night 
on guard, as I have said, with a fair measure 
of fear, for Soto and those who were with him 
related what they had seen and the great 
number of troops which the Indian [Ataba- 
lipa] had and because they were without 
knowledge of how these Indians fought or of 
what valour was theirs, because up to that 



178 Pedro Pizarro 

time they had not fought with Indian war- 
riours, save in Tumbez and on la Puna where 
the number of them did not go above six hun- 
dred. 



https://archive.org/stream/reportsondiscove04mark/reportsondiscove04mark_djvu.txt
	" First came three hundred youths with bows and arrows, singing, 
and cleaning the road with their hands. Then came a thousand men 
with pikes, having no iron tips, but with the points hardened in the fire. 
They wore a livery of white and red squares, like a chess board. A 
third squadron then entered, with hammers of copper and silver. (Rela- 
cioii del Primer Descubrimiento MS.) 




more quotes:

https://books.google.com/books?id=3_4-DQAAQBAJ&pg=PT48&lpg=PT48&dq=chessboard+sweeping+gold+Atahuallpa&source=bl&ots=Cl-CClJgAn&sig=BGlukQMGDHh6mon_8esfDkH-KWI&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwixyeiTm-PaAhUEnlkKHfJbAg4Q6AEIUTAJ#v=onepage&q=chessboard%20sweeping%20gold%20Atahuallpa&f=false


some reports written by them:

https://archive.org/details/reportsondiscove04mark


another sourcebook (originals in Spanish) https://books.google.com/books?id=2B7C40Ya40QC&pg=PA332&lpg=PA332



------


http://www.historyisaweapon.com/defcon7/%5BHemming_John%5D_The_Conquest_of_the_Incas(BookZZ.org).pdf
	It  is  fascinating  to  notice  the  changing  attitudes  of  Spanish  writers  towards
Atahualpa's death. The first wave of eyewitnesses - the official secretaries Francisco de
Xerez and Pedro Sancho, the overseer Miguel de Estete, Cristobal de Mena, and the town
council  of  Jauja  -  all  omitted  any  mention  of  Soto's  reconnaissance  and  its  negative
findings. Xerez alone spoke vaguely of two native scouts being sent to investigate. These
writers already felt unsure of themselves. In the face of possible censure, they closed
ranks to insist on the reality of the danger from Rumiñavi's army.


	....underneath  their  tunics'.
	  Hernando  Pizarro,  Letter  to  Oidores  86.  Other
	chroniclers, Mena, Xerez, Estete, Diego de Silva y Guzman and Pedro Cataño, stressed
	the weapons under the tunics as though these constituted some breach of faith. The
	author  of  the  anonymous 
	Nouvelles  certaines  des  Isles  du  Peru,
	  a  slim  book  that
	appeared in French in 1534, claimed that Atahualpa's men carried battle-axes and silver
	halberds, and that 'thick clubs hung at their belts ... and a great many men were carrying
	javelins, bows and arrows' 
	(Nouvelles certaines
	 6).


	...The  departure  of  this  reconnaissance  did  little  to  calm  the  mounting  hysteria  at Cajamarca. The young soldier Pedro Cataño claimed that he had been highly indignant when he first heard the rumour that the Inca might be killed. He hurried off to protest to the Governor; but Pizarro put him in chains and in prison to punish his presumption and to cool his youthful ardour. Almagro visited him in prison, and Pizarro then flattered him with an invitation to the great honour of dining with Almagro and himself. During the dinner there were emotional speeches in which Pizarro thanked young Cataño for having helped dissuade him from harming the Inca. Cataño, overcome, declared that 'in the name of all the conquistadores, he kissed the hands of His Lordship for having acted in this way*. The dinner was followed by a game of cards. While they were playing, the Biscayan Pedro de Anades burst into the room dragging a Nicaraguan Indian. He explained that this Indian had been three leagues from Cajamarca and had seen a vast horde of native troops advancing towards the town. Pizarro interrogated the Indian who repeated his story with corroborative details. Almagro burst out: 'Is Your Lordship going to allow us all to die, out of love of Cataño?' Pizarro left the room in silence, followed shortly afterwards by Almagro. Xerez and Mena also recorded the arrival at sunset on a Saturday night of 'two Indians who were in the Spaniards' service'. These said they had met other natives fleeing before an approaching army. This army - which the natives themselves had not seen - 'had arrived three leagues from there and would come that night or the next to attack the Christians' camp for it was approaching at great speed'.


------



http://biblioteca.org.ar/libros/151521.pdf

https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=es&u=http://biblioteca.org.ar/libros/151521.pdf&prev=search


http://www.worldcat.org/title/relacion-del-descubrimiento-del-reino-del-peru-edicion-prologo-y-notas-de-raul-porras-berrenechea/oclc/459237328
	Relación del descubrimiento del reino del Perú. Edición, prólogo y notas de Raul Porras Berrenechea.




